<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89710-0013 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-10-89.f2.A1012</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4> Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 130 / Monday, July 10, 1989 /Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">PENSION BENEFIT GUARANTY CORPORATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 2610 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 1212-AA53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Payment of Premiums </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final rule revises the Pension Benefit GuarantyCorporation's interim regulation on Payment of Premiums, 29 CFR Part 2610.The PBGC published the interim regulation expeditiously, on June 30, 1988,in order to provide necessary guidance for 1988 premium payments. Thereafter,on October 5, 1988, the PBGC issued a notice of proposed rulemaking thataddressed certain issues not covered in the interim rule and that affordedthe public the opportunity to comment on the entire premium regulation.The effect of this final regulation is to replace the interim rule, effectivefor premium payment years beginning on or after January 1, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>July 10, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Harold J. Ashner, Senior Counsel,Office of the General Counsel (Code 22500), Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation,2020 K Street, NW. Washington, DC 20006; telephone 202-778-8823 (202-778-8059for TTY and TDD). These are not toll-free numbers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> <ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987, Pub.L. 100-203, (``OBRA'87'') includes the Pension Protection Act, which amends section 4006 ofthe Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended, (``ERISA'')to establish a two-part premium structure for single-employer plans, <T3>i.e.</T3>, a flat rate per capita assessment and a variable rate assessmentbased on a plan's unfunded vested benefits, effective for plan years beginningon or after January 1, 1988. In order to reflect and to implement thesechanges, the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation (the ``PBGC'') on June30, 1988, issued an interim rule revising its regulation on Payment ofPremiums at 29 CFR Part 2610 (53 FR 24906). Because of the urgent needto provide plans with the rules for computing and paying premiums for 1988plan years, the PBGC determined that it would be impracticable and contraryto the public interest to provide for notice of and public comment on thatregulation prior to issuance. On October 5, 1988, the PBGC issued a notice of proposed rulemaking thatlargely restated the interim rule, in order to solicit public comment (53FR 39200). The proposed rulemaking also included a number of proposed amendmentsto the interim rule and addressed a number of issues that the PBGC hadnot previously addressed. Twenty comments were submitted on the proposedrule, with most of the comments coming from actuarial consulting firms.The PBGC has reviewed these comments and has made a number of changes inthe regulation in response to them. The PBGC has also made other changesin the regulation on its own initiative, many of them in response to questionsasked by plan professionals preparing their 1988 premium filings. <ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory and Regulatory Framework </ITAG>The statutory provisions governing the variable rate premium are discussedin some detail in the preamble to the interim regulation and are only brieflysummarized here. Under section 9331 of OBRA '87 (amending ERISA section4006), the single-employer plan premium for plan years beginning on orafter January 1, 1988, is composed of a flat rate per capita assessment(as under prior law) and a new variable rate assessment that is based onthe value of a plan's unfunded vested benefits and is also determined ona per participant basis (section 4006(a)(3)(A) and (a)(3)(E)). The flatrate assessment is $16 per participant. ERISA section 4006(a)(3)(E) provides the basic formula for computing thevariable rate assessment for each participant: $6 for each $1,000 (or fractionthereof) of a plan's ``unfunded vested benefits'' (determined as of thelast day of the preceding plan year) with that product divided by the numberof participants in the plan as of the last day of the preceding plan year.The variable rate assessment is subject to a statutory ceiling (ERISA section4006(a)(3)(E)(iv)(I)) of $34 per participant, resulting in a maximum perparticipant premium of $50. This $34 statutory ceiling is subject to reductionbased on the contribution history of the plan. The formula for computing the variable rate assessment for each participantis based, in large part, on the determination of the plan's ``unfundedvested benefits.'' This term is defined in the statute (ERISA section 4006(a)(3)(E)(iii))as the amount that would be the plan's ``unfunded current liability'' (withinthe meaning of ERISA section 302(d)(8)(A)) as of the close of the precedingplan year, subject to two qualifications: (1) Only vested benefits aretaken into account in the calculation (ERISA section 4006(a)(3)(E)(iii)(I));and (2) The interest rate used in valuing vested benefits must equal 80%of the annual yield on 30-year Treasury securities for the month precedingthe month in which the plan year begins (ERISA section 4006(a)(3)(E)(iii)(II)).The PBGC's proposed rule, like the interim rule, provided two methods fordetermining the amount of a plan's unfunded vested benefits. Under the``general rule'' (andSection; 2610.23(a)), an enrolled actuary must determinethe amount of the plan's unfunded vested benefits as of the last day ofthe plan year preceding the premium payment year based on the plan's provisionsand population as of that date, and must certify that the determinationwas made in a manner consistent with generally accepted actuarial principlesand practices. Under the ``alternative calculation method'' (andSection;2610.23(c)), which is subject to certain restrictions for large plans (<T3>i.e.</T3>, those with 500 or more participants), the plan administratormust calculate the amount of the plan's unfunded vested benefits basedon certain data from the plan's Form 5500, Schedule B, for the plan yearpreceding the premium payment year, using formulae specified in the regulation.Finally, both the interim rule and the proposed rule provide a number ofexemptions and special rules (andSection; 2610.24) regarding the variablerate portion of the premium. <ITAG tagnum="84">General Comments </ITAG>While most of the comments addressed particular sections of the proposedregulation, some addressed more general matters. These general commentsare discussed first. Two commenters objected to the increase in the flat rate assessment to$16. The new premium structure was designed to generate enough revenueto eliminate the PBGC's deficit over a reasonable period of time and topay future claims and expenses as they are incurred. The introduction ofa premium charge based on plan underfunding permits a fairer allocationof cost among plans based on their funding levels. However, it would nothave been possible to generate all the additional revenue needed from acharge on underfunded plans without overburdening these plans and, in manycases, the companies maintaining them. The combination of flat rate andvariable rate charges enacted by the Congress reflects a careful balancingof concerns for equity and affordability. Finally, the PBGC points outthat the increase in the flat rate assessment is required by statute andis thus outside the scope of the PBGC's rulemaking authority. Three commenters objected to the imposition of a variable rate assessmenton plans that, while underfunded for premium purposes, are overfunded forfunding purposes. The reason that this may occur is that the statutoryinterest rate used for premium purposes is different from the rate or ratesused for funding purposes. The statute does not exempt plans at the fullfunding limit from the variable rate premium requirements, and the PBGCdoes not have the authority to create such an exemption by regulation.Five commenters expressed concern about the administrative burden and therelated costs imposed on plans as a result of the variable rate premiumrequirements. The comments focused particularly on the burdens for smallplans (<T3>i.e.</T3>, those with fewer than 100 participants). (One of these commentersargued, erroneously, that the premium requirements are burdensome for smallplans in that actuarial certification is required; in fact, under the alternativecalculation method, such certification is required only for plans withmore than 500 participants (andSection; 2610.23(d)).) Two of the commenterssuggested that small plans be exempted from the variable rate premium.The PBGC has no authority under the law to exempt small plans from thenew premium requirements, and thus has not adopted this suggestion.Nevertheless, the PBGC shares the concerns expressed by the commenters.The new statutory rules obviously add complexity to the premium paymentprocess and, as a result, some level of increased burden and cost is unavoidable.The PBGC has attempted in the premium regulation to keep these burdensand costs to a minimum. Thus, for example, the interim and proposed regulationspermit plans to use data collected for other purposes as the starting pointfor determining unfunded vested benefits under the general rule; provideplans with the option of using a simplified a1ternative calculation method;include a number of exemptions and special rules to simplify or, in somecases, to eliminate calculation requirements; and establish a later duedate for the variable rate portion of the premium. Moreover, this finalregulation contains additional simplifications not included in the interimor proposed regulations. The PBGC will continue to explore ways in whichit may further reduce the burdens and costs imposed on premium payers ina manner consistent with the pertinent statutory requirements. The premium regulation requires enrolled actuaries to make a number ofdeterminations in a manner consistent with generally accepted actuarialprinciples and practices. One commenter requested that the PBGC elaborateon the scope of the actuary's responsibility under the regulation, thepenalties the actuary could face, and the recourse available to the actuaryin connection with any such penalty. The responsibility of the actuary, simply put, is to comply with the premiumregulation in a manner consistent with generally accepted actuarial principlesand practices. The PBGC, of course, does not establish these principlesand practices. If the PBGC has reason to believe that an actuary has notmet this responsibility and premiums are underpaid as a result, the PBGCmay bring appropriate legal action against an actuary. In addition, thePBGC may refer a matter involving apparent misfeasance by an actuary toan appropriate authority, such as the Joint Board for the Enrollment ofActuaries. The penalties that might be imposed in this event, and the recourseavailable to the actuary, are matters that fall outside the jurisdictionof the PBGC. The same commenter requested that the PBGC provide specific guidelinesregarding the degree of error in a premium filing that would be materialenough to require an amended filing, and asked to whom the enrolled actuaryshould report any such error and how the error should be reported. Anothercommenter asked whether an amended premium filing is required if the planwould not owe a variable rate amount under both the original and the amendedfiling. An enrolled actuary who determines that a premium filing is erroneousis required to report the error to the plan administrator, and the planadministrator is required to correct the error through an amended premiumfiling with the PBGC. These steps must be followed anytime the enrolledactuary or the plan administrator determines that any of the data reportedon the premium payment forms or any of the underlying data were incorrect.Of course, in cases where the error resulted in an underpayment of thepremium, the PBGC would assess interest and, unless waived, penalties.Another commenter proposed that plan administrators submit the plan's ScheduleB to the PBGC as part of the plan's premium filing, and that the PBGC computethe plan's premium obligation based on the data on the Schedule B. ThePBGC does not have the staff to do this and, thus, has not adopted theproposal. In the proposed rule, the PBGC solicited public comment on the frequencywith which it should update the interest rates in Appendix B. One commenteraddressed this issue, expressing a preference that the PBGC continue updatingAppendix B on a monthly basis so as to facilitate the ability of actuariesto calculate a plan's premium obligation as part of a plan valuation preparedearly in the plan year. After careful consideration of this matter, the PBGC has concluded thatthe best approach is to consolidate the publication of both sets of interestrates under the premium regulation on a quarterly basis, to publish theserates on the same date as the various other Title lV rates are published,and to continue the monthly distribution of PBGC rates to plan professionalsthrough the PBGC's ``Technical Updates.'' As an example, the PBGC willpublish on October 13, 1989, (because the normal publication date, the15th, is a Sunday) the Appendix A late payment interest rate applicableto the October to December quarter and the Appendix B valuation interestrates for August, September and October. (The PBGC notes that under thissystem, it would publish the Appendix A rate every quarter, even when thereis no change from the prior quarter. This change is made in response tocomplaints from practitioners that they have difficulty keeping track ofthe Appendix A rate under the current system in which a new rate is publishedonly when there is a rate change.) The valuation interest rates collected in Appendix B change monthly, anda given rate applies with respect to all premium payment years beginningduring that month. Thus, for a calendar year plan, the January interestrate is used to value vested benefits for the variable rate portion ofthe premium due on September 15. Because few plan professionals do planvaluations at the very beginning of a plan year, the PBGC does not believethat a one or two month delay in its publication of the interest ratesin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> will be an inconvenience. Those actuaries thatare doing a valuation within the first two months of a plan year can obtainthe rates by subscribing to the PBGC's monthly ``Technical Updates'' (forwhich the PBGC has a mailing list of some 4,000 plan professionals) orby checking the pertinent Federal Reserve Board publications, StatisticalRelease G.13 and H.15. Finally, one commenter requested that the PBGC specify which changes inthe premium regulation are effective only for 1989 and later premium paymentyears. In order to provide the clearest possible guidance for the public,the PBGC has indicated in the final regulation which provisions apply forwhich premium payment years. Unless otherwise indicated, Subpart A of thefinal regulation (covering both single-employer and multiemployer plans)is effective for all premium payment years; Subpart B (covering single-employerplans only) is effective for post-1987 premium payment years; and SubpartC is effective for all premium payment years for multiemployer plans andfor pre-1988 premium payment years for single-employer plans. Section 2610.2_Definitions One commenter suggested a change in the definition of active participant(andSection; 2610.2(a)(2)) to permit plans not to count as participants forpremium purposes certain non-vested individuals that leave employment.The PBGC has received numerous inquiries about the same subject since theRetirement Equity Act of 1984 (``REA'') established certain rights fornon-vested individuals who had left employment. The specific suggestionin the comment was to exclude non-vested employees who had either incurreda one-year break-in-service (or had a one-year severance from service ina plan using elapsed time vesting rules), or who had quit or been discharged.The PBGC is generally sympathetic to the commenter's position, but believesthat nonvested individuals should not be dropped from the premium countas soon as they separate from employment, regardless of the reason forseparation. The final regulation, like the proposed and interim regulations,excludes from the definition of participant for premium purposes individualswho have had a break in service the greater of one year or the break-in-serviceperiod specified in the plan. For example, in a plan with a one-year orshorter break-in-service period, a nonvested individual would be countedas a participant for premium purposes if he or she left covered employmentless than a year before the participant count date but would not be countedif he or she left a year or more before the participant count date. ThePBGC does not believe that counting the former individual as a participantcreates an undue premium burden. On a related issue, the PBGC notes that under REA, a nonvested participantwho has a break in service retains credit for the pre-break service ifthe number of consecutive one-year breaks is equal to or less than thegreater of five years or the aggregate pre-break service. Apparently afterREA, some plans were amended to redefine a break-in-service period as fiveyears instead of one year. However, a plan with a break-in-service periodlonger than one year may be amended prospectively to provide for five consecutiveone-year break-in-service periods and still meet the REA requirements.This amendment may reduce the number of individuals that must be countedas participants for premium purposes and thus provide the premium reliefsought by the commenter.Finally, the PBGC notes that the instructions to the PBGC Form l have beenmisleading on this point, in that the instructions have stated that theparticipant count reported on the Form 1 should usually be the same asthe Form 5500 participant count for the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. This probably would not be true for a plan that has a five-yearor 60-month break-in-service period. Accordingly, the 1989 Form 1 instructionswill be clarified on this point and will provide that the Form 5500 participantcount may be used as a safe harbor for premium computation purposes.Section 2610.3_FormsOne commenter suggested that the PBGC publish its annual premium PaymentPackage (which contains the Form 1-ES, Form 1 and Schedule A, along withinstructions) in proposed form each year so as to give the public an opportunityto comment on it. While agency forms are not typically published as proposalsfor public comment, as are regulations, there is an existing procedurefor the public to comment on agency forms prior to their issuance. Thisprocedure is established under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, asamended, and is administered by the Office of Management and Budget (``OMB'').<T3> See </T3>5 CFR Part 1320.Any time an agency wants to issue a new or revised form, that form mustfirst be approved by OMB. (Every approved form carries an OMB number inthe upper right-hand corner.) In addition, forms that do not change mustnevertheless be re-approved by OMB every three years. When an agency submitsa form to OMB for approval, it must publish concurrently a notice in the<T4> Federal Register </T4>advising the public that it has requested approvalof the form, stating where copies of the form can be obtained and how interestedpersons may submit comments on the form. This review period normally runs60 days. The PBGC Form 1, Form 1-ES and Schedule A go through this procedure,and the PBGC welcomes public comment on the forms.One commenter suggested that the PBGC adopt a ``substitute forms'' programlike that of the Internal Revenue Service (the ``IRS''), so that plan professionalscan input data into their computers and run the data off directly ontosuitable forms that could be filed with the PBGC. While the PBGC does notpresently have staff resources adequate to review and to approve substituteforms, as is done under the IRS program, it will permit the use of re-typedor other facsimile forms. However, any such forms must present the sameinformation items, with each in the same location, as on the PBGC forms.A form that does not satisfy this condition may be treated as not havingbeen filed and returneu to the submitter.Section 2610.4_Mailing AddressOne commenter requested that the PBGC publish a street address for premiumfilings, in addition to the Post Office Box address it now publishes, sothat mail delivery services other than the U.S. Postal Service may competefor delivery of premium filings. The PBGC agrees and has amended andSection;2610.4 to include a street address.Section 2610.11_Recordkeeping Requirements; PBGC AuditsSection 2610.11 of the proposed regulation required plan administratorsto retain ``all plan records * * * that are necessary to support or tovalidate premium payments.'' One commenter suggested that the PBGC insteadrequire only that plan administrators retain documentation needed to supportadjustments made to entries reported (or to be reported) on the ScheduleB, since the documentation needed to support the Schedule B must alreadybe retained under section 107 of ERISA. The PBGC has not adopted this suggestion.The PBGC's recordkeeping requirement is needed to enable the PBGC to monitorand to enforce compliance with the premium regulation and, as such, itis properly included in the premium regulation. Because this recordkeepingrequirement is, as the commenter states, largely duplicative of the recordkeepingrequirements of section 107 of ERISA, it should not impose any significantadditional burden on plan administrators.Section 2610.22(a)(3)_Cap on Variable Rate AmountOne commenter objected to the proposed rule in andSection; 2610.22(a)(3)(iii)establishing the qualifications for the cap reduction when the sponsormaintains at least one defined contribution plan and at least one definedbenefit plan. The comment asserted that, as written, the rule would requirethat contributions to the defined benefit plan had equalled the Code section404(a)(7)(A) limit in order for the plans to qualify for the cap reduction,determined without regard to participant coverage of the plans. The commentobjected to this result.The PBGC notes that the rule as proposed referenced Code section 404(a)(7)(A),which, by its own terms, applies only in situations where a plan sponsormaintains both defined contribution and defined benefit plans and someemployees are participants in both. (The final regulation has been revisedto reflect explicitly this common-participation requirement.) In all othersituations (<T3>e.g.,</T3> both defined contribution and defined benefit plans butwith separate participant groups, or multiple defined benefit plans coveringoverlapping groups of participants but no defined contribution plans),the general maximum deductibility rules in Code section 404 (a)(1)-(a)(3)apply, as does the usual rule under the premium regulation that all plansmaintained by the same sponsor (or controlled group) are treated separately.Thus, if a sponsor maintained several defined benefit plans but no definedcontribution plans, the determination of whether the cap reduction appliedwould be made in a plan-by-plan basis, comparing the contributions to eachagainst the maximum deductible limit for each during the five base periodyears. This rule is unchanged even if the plans cover some of the sameparticipants.The PBGC has also revised andSection; 2610.22(a)(3)(iii) to clarify thatit applies only when the plan did not receive the maximum deductible amountdetermined without regard to the Code section 404(a)(7)(A) limitation.Thus, a covered defined benefit plan does not lose the benefit of the capreduction merely because the contributing sponsor reduced contributionsto another covered defined benefit plan below the Code section 404(a)(1)limitation in order to meet the Code section 404(a)(7)(A) limitation.A commenter requested that the PBGC provide for carryover of contributionswhere a contributing sponsor credits a contribution to the plan's fundingstandard account for a particular plan year, but does not reflect the contributionfor deduction purposes until the contributing sponsor's next taxable year.The statutory provisions governing the cap reduction measure the contributionhistory of the plan with respect to plan years rather than taxable years.The taxable year in which the contribution is reflected for deduction purposesis not relevant, and there is thus no need to provide for carryover rules.The PBGC stated in the preamble to the proposed rule that it was consideringwhether the cap reduction should apply in the case of a plan maintainedby a nonprofit entity and, if so, how to determine whether a contributionduring the base period equalled the maximum deductible amount. One commenteraddressed these issues, arguing that, since nonprofit entities get themaximum tax deduction with a contribution of zero dollars, they shouldget the benefit of the cap reduction even if they made no contributionduring a base period year. The PBGC does not believe that this approachis consistent with the underlying purpose of the cap reduction, <T3>i.e.,</T3> to provide relief in the case of plan sponsors that attemptedto improve the plan's funding level by making the maximum deductible contribution,and therefore has not adopted it.The PBGC believes that a plan maintained by a nonprofit entity should getthe benefit of the cap reduction on the same basis as for-profit entities,<T3>i.e., </T3>when the nonprofit entity made contributions in amountsthat would have been the maximum deductible contribution under Code section404 if the contributing sponsor were a for-profit entity. This approachfurthers the purposes of the cap reduction by providing relief in the caseof all plan sponsors that made comparable attempts to improve the plan'sfunding level, irrespective of the tax status of the sponsor. Accordingly,beginning with the 1989 premium payment year, a plan maintained by a nonprofitentity is entitled to the cap reduction with respect to a base period yearif an enrolled actuary certifies that the amounts contributed to the planfor that year were at least equal to the amount that would have been themaximum deductible contribution if the contributing sponsor of the planwas a for-profit entity. A question has been raised in connection with a 1988 premium filing asto whether and under what circumstances the cap reduction applies in thecase of plans that have received funding waivers. The IRS permits the contributingsponsor of such a plan to deduct (subject to the full funding limit) contributionssufficient to create a credit balance in the funding standard account (asof the end of the plan year) equal to the total of the outstanding balancesof all waived funding deficiencies. Accordingly, if the credit balancein the plan's funding standard account (as of the end of the plan year)for a base period year is less than this total, the plan did not receivethe maximum deductible contribution and thus is not entitled to the benefitof the cap reduction with respect to that base period year. One commenter requested that the PBGC establish rules providing for thepass-through of the cap reduction in the case of mergers and spinoffs.Such rules would have to be complex in order to deal properly with alltransfers of plan liabilities. The PBGC does not believe that the additionof this complexity to the premium regulation is warranted, particularlysince the cap reduction is only a transitional, and thus temporary, partof the premium structure. Section 2610.22(d)_Special refund rule for certain short plan years The PBGC stated in the preamble to the proposed rule that it had decidednot to promulgate the lengthy and complicated rules that would be neededto eliminate so-called ``duplicate premiums'' in connection with certainmergers, consolidations and spinoffs. Two commenters requested that thePBGC issue such rules. For the reasons stated in the proposed rule preamble,the PBGC is not doing so at this time. However, the PBGC will continueto consider whether to issue these rules at a future time. The PBGC did propose a special refund rule for short plan years resultingfrom events other than multiple plan transactions (andSection; 2610.22(d)).This special rule, covering short initial plan years, changes in plan yearsand short final plan years, is effective beginning with the 1989 premiumpayment year. (However, as noted in the preamble to the proposed rule (53FR 39205), the special refund rule applicable to a change in plan yearsis a codification of the PBGC's existing practice with regard to pre-1989premium payment years.) One commenter requested that the PBGC extend thespecial refund rule to apply to the 1988 premium payment year. The retroactiveapplication of this rule would create significant administrative burdensfor the PBGC. In addition, the PBGC sees no reason in this case to departfrom the general principle of prospective rulemaking. Accordingly, thePBGC has decided not to change the effective date of this special rule.Finally, one commenter suggested that the refund for a plan's final shortplan year be determined by treating the plan year as ending (in the caseof a standard termination) at the expiration of the period within whichthe PBGC may issue a notice of noncompliance under ERISA section 4041(b)(2)(C).The statute does not permit this. Under ERISA section 4007(a), premiumscontinue to accrue until the plan's assets are distributed pursuant tothe termination procedure, or until a trustee is appointed pursuant toERISA section 4042, whichever is earlier. Accordingly, the PBGC has notadopted this suggestion. Section 2610.23(a)_General rule The PBGC stated in the preamble to the proposed rule that it is left tothe enrolled actuary to decide, in a manner consistent with generally acceptedactuarial principles and practices, whether to perform a separate valuationfor premium purposes or to rely on an existing valuation. One commenterobjected to the PBGC's reference in this context to generally acceptedactuarial principles and practices, arguing that the actuary's decisionto rely on an existing valuation may be based on the unavailability ofthe data needed to perform a new valuation, rather than on generally acceptedactuarial principles and practices. The concept of generally accepted actuarialprinciples and practices necessarily encompasses practical considerationssuch as the availability of needed data and, therefore, is adequate todefine the actuary's responsibility in the context cited. One commenter requested guidance regarding the adjustments an actuary wouldhave to make to an earlier valuation (<T3>e.g., </T3>a valuation performed as of the first day of the prior planyear) so as to reflect the plan's population on the statutory date fordetermining unfunded vested benefits (<T3>i.e., </T3>the last day of the prior plan year). As the PBGC statedin the preamble to the interim rule, the actuary may determine the plan'spopulation either on the basis of an actual census or a representativesample of the plan's population. It is up to the enrolled actuary to determine,in a manner consistent with generally accepted actuarial principles andpractices, what data to collect, and what sampling technique to use, inconnection with any such sample. The same commenter stated that the requirement that the actuary determinethe plan's population as of the last day of the prior plan year is burdensomein the case of a plan for which the valuation is done as of a date otherthan the first or last day of the plan year. The commenter recommendedthat the actuary be permitted in such a case to base the determinationof the plan's unfunded vested benefits on the plan's population as of anydate in the prior plan year. The PBGC has not adopted this recommendation.Under the statute, a plan's unfunded vested benefits must be determinedas of the last day of the prior plan year, irrespective of the date asof which the plan valuation is performed. Moreover, the problem does notappear to be a significant one. In this connection, the PBGC points outthat relatively few plans have a valuation date other than the first orlast day of the plan year; that the actuary for such a plan may, as notedabove, rely on a representative sample rather than on an actual census;and that the plan may avoid the problem altogether by using the alternativecalculation method. The PBGC has made a change in the general rule regarding premium valuationsthat are done as of the first day of the premium payment year. Under theproposed rule, the actuary was required to base such a valuation on theassumptions and methods used for funding purposes for the prior plan year.The PBGC has revised the final rule (andSection; 2610.23(a)(1)) to providethat when the actuary is using a valuation as of the first day of the premiumpayment year, that valuation must be based on the assumptions and methodsused for funding purposes for the premium payment year. However, the PBGCreminds enrolled actuaries that if the premium valuation results are materiallydifferent than what would have been determined as of the last day of theprior plan year, the enrolled actuary is required to make adjustments soas to reflect appropriately the values as of the last day of the priorplan year (except where the unadjusted valuation would result in greaterunfunded vested benefits) (andSection; 2610.23(a)(2)). Finally, the PBGC reminds plan professionals that the various adjustmentsand modifications required or permitted under the general rule (and underthe alternative calculation method) in determining a plan's unfunded vestedbenefits apply only for premium calculation purposes and are not applicableto the determination of current liability under section 302 of ERISA andsection 412 of the Code.Section 2610.23(b)(1)_Vested Benefits Amount One commenter requested that the PBGC clarify the assumptions to be usedin determining the vested portion of current liability for premium purposes,or at least give interim guidance that may be used pending clarificationby the IRS. The PBGC is unable to provide the requested guidance, becauseonly the IRS has authority to prescribe the assumptions to be used in determiningcurrent liability. The PBGC has discussed this issue with the IRS, andthe IRS is not yet ready to issue guidance on this matter. Another commenter suggested that the PBGC require that the interest rateused in valuing vested benefits for premium purposes be the same for allplan years beginning in a given calendar year. The statute does not permitthis. Under ERISA section 4006(a)(3)(E)(iii)(II), the required interestrate is tied to the month, rather than the calendar year, in which theplan year begins. Accordingly, the PBGC has not adopted this suggestion.Finally, under the proposed regulation, both the general rule (andSection;2610.23(b)(1)) and the alternative calculation method (andSection; 2610.23(c))provided that vested benefits need not be adjusted to reflect the statutoryinterest rate if the rate (or rates) used under the plan to determine vestedbenefits was (or were all) lower than the statutory rate. A commenter suggestedthat the PBGC substitute ``not greater than'' for ``lower than'' so thata plan would have the benefit of the interest rate adjustment exemptioneven though one of the plan rates used to value vested benefits equalledthe statutory rate. The PBGC agrees and has made the requested change bothin the general rule and in the alternative calculation method. In addition, the PBGC has made a minor revision in andSection; 2610.23(b)(1)to delete the ambiguous reference to the interest rate used ``in the plan'sfunding valuation,'' because for 1988 and later plan years, many planswill use a valuation interest rate determined under Code section 412(c)(3)for some purposes and the statutory rate prescribed under section 412(b)(5)for determining current liability. Therefore, andSection; 2610.23(b)(1) isrevised to refer to the interest rate used for determining current liability.Section 2610.23(b)(2)_Actuarial Value of Assets One commenter objected to the proposed rule's exclusion of contributions``for the premium payment year'' from the actuarial value of assets, pointingout that employer contributions enhance benefit security regardless ofthe plan year for which they are made. Initially, the PBGC notes that contributionsfor the premium payment year would rarely be part of a plan's assets asof the statutory date for determining unfunded vested benefits, <T3>i.e.</T3>, the last day of the prior plan year. Moreover, even in thosefew cases in which an employer has made advance contributions for the premiumpayment year, the PBGC believes that it would be inappropriate to countthose contributions as part of the plan's assets for premium purposes.The determination of unfunded vested benefits serves as a snapshot of theplan's funding status as of the end of the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. Changes in plan liabilities relating to the premium paymentyear are not taken into account, whether they result from benefit accruals,benefit payouts, a change in actuarial assumptions or methods, a plan amendmentor other causes. Similarly, any increase or decrease in asset values duringthe premium payment year is irrelevant, regardless of the cause. The PBGCbelieves that the inclusion of contributions for the premium payment yearin the plan's asset values, without also taking into account the variousother changes to asset and benefit values relating to the premium paymentyear, would distort the determination of the plan's unfunded vested benefits.The same commenter requested guidance regarding how to determine whethera particular contribution is ``for'' a plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. The plan year for which a contribution is made is the planyear for which the contribution is credited to the funding standard accountas ``the amount considered contributed by the employer to or under theplan for the plan year'' pursuant to section 412(b)(2)(A) of the Code andsection 302(b)(2)(A) of ERISA. If this designation has been ambiguous inthe past, it should no longer be so, now that contributions must be paidquarterly. Beginning with contributions for the 1989 plan year, contributingsponsors will have to designate the plan year for which a contributionis to be credited so as to distinguish the quarterly contributions requiredduring the plan year from the final contribution(s) made for the previousplan year. The same commenter also requested that the PBGC eliminate the requirementthat contributions paid during the premium payment year be discounted withinterest to the last day of the prior plan year, arguing that such discountingis not required for funding purposes and therefore should not be requiredfor premium purposes. Code section 412(c)(10)(A) provides for an eightand one-half month ``grace period'' for contributions, thereby eliminatingthe need for discounting of contributions made during that period. However,the funding rules recognize that the contribution was made after the lastday of the plan year by treating the ``lost'' earnings on that contributionas an experience loss that is amortized over future plan years. No suchmechanism exists for premium purposes. Thus, the only way to recognize,for premium purposes, the date on which the contribution is made is todiscount the contribution on a current basis. The proposed rule specifies that the interest rate used to discount contributionsis the plan asset valuation rate under the general rule (andSection; 2610.23(b)(2))and the statutory rate under the alternative calculation method (andSection;2610.23(c)(3)). Two commenters argued that the statutory rate should alsobe used to discount contributions under the general rule. The PBGC disagrees.Under the general rule, all asset values must be determined in accordancewith the plan's assumptions and methods used to value assets for fundingpurposes. It would be inconsistent with this requirement to discount thevalue of certain assets (i.e., contributions received after the last dayof the plan year preceding the premium payment year) at a different interestrate. Under the alternative calculation method, in the interest of simplicity,contributions are discounted back to the first day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year at the same rate used to bring forward the valueof the plan's unfunded vested benefits determined as of that date, i.e.,the statutory 2ate. Thus, the discounting rules in the regulation ensurethat the value of plan assets is adjusted in a manner appropriate to themethod used for determining a plan's unfunded vested benefits. Two commenters raised a number of questions concerning the requirementto discount contributions on a daily compound basis. (The proposed rulerequired daily compounding both under the general rule and the alternativecalculation method.) The PBGC has modified this rule in the final regulation.With respect to the general rule, a plan must discount contributions atthe plan asset valuation rate and in accordance with the plan's discountingrules. Thus, if a plan normally discounts asset values with interest compoundedmonthly, it is required to discount contributions at the plan's interestrate compounded monthly. This is consistent with the overall approach underthe general rule of requiring plans to determine unfunded vested benefitsusing the same methods and assumptions that are used for funding purposes.This rule applies for 1988 and later premium payment years. With respect to the alternative calculation method, the PBGC has determinedthat daily compounding of interest in the discounting calculation may beunduly burdensome for some plans. Accordingly, under the final rule, contributionsare to be discounted at the statutory interest rate, with interest generallycompounded annually. However, for any partial years within the discountingperiod, a plan may, at its discretion, use simple interest. This rule appliesfor premium payment years beginning on or after January 1, 1989. (For 1988premium payment years, plans using the alternative calculation method wererequired simply to discount contributions at the statutory interest rate.Therefore, for 1988 premiums, any reasonable method of discounting is acceptable.)Finally, the PBGC has made a change on its own initiative with respectto the adjustment for contributions in the case of a plan with fewer than500 participants. Under the final regulation, such a plan is not required,under either the general rule or the alternative calculation method, toadd to the value of plan assets contributions for plan years precedingthe premium payment year. This will eliminate one more calculation, forall but the largest plans, in cases where the calculation would not affectthe premium obligation because, <T3>e.g., </T3>the plan is fully funded without the addition of contributions.This new rule applies for premium payment years beginning on or after January1, 1989. Section 2610.23(c)_Alternative Method for Calculating Unfunded Vested BenefitsProposed andSection; 2610.23(c) exempted plans from the interest rate adjustmentrequirement if the plan administrator certifies that the ``plan's interestrate (or rates) used to determine the values in lines 6d(i) and 6d(ii)of the Schedule B was (or were all) lower than'' the statutory rate. ThePBGC has substituted ``not greater than'' for ``lower'' in this provision,for the same reasons noted above in the discussion of andSection; 2610.23(b)(2).In addition, one commenter stated that the use of the term, ``plan's interestrate,'' is confusing in that either the plan rate or the disclosure ratemay be used to determine the values in line 6d of the Schedule B. (Whetherthe plan rate or the disclosure rate is used, it must, pursuant to theinstructions for the 1988 Schedule B, be within 10% of the weighted averageof the 30-year Treasury bond rate as published by the IRS.) The PBGC agrees,and has therefore deleted the word, ``plan's.'' One commenter raised a question as to whether contributions made duringthe plan year preceding the premium payment year, but not included in theasset values reported on the Schedule B for that prior plan year, are tobe included in the asset value under the alternative calculation method.Section 2610.23(c)(4) states that the asset values reported on the ScheduleB (normally line 8b) are to be adjusted in accordance with the provisionsgoverning asset values under the general rule (andSection; 2610.23(b)(2)),subject to the exception relating to discounting of contributions. Thus,as under the general rule, contributions for any plan year prior to thepremium payment year are to be included (or may be included, for planswith fewer than 500 participants) in the asset value if paid by the earlierof the due date or payment date for the variable rate portion of the premium.This is so irrespective of whether the contribution is included in theasset values reported on the Schedule B. The PBGC proposed the use under the alternative calculation method of asurrogate for calculating a plan's accruals during the plan year precedingthe premium payment year (proposed andSection; 2610.23(c)(1)). That surrogatewas 7% of the value reported in line 6d(ii) of the Schedule B for vestedbenefits of active and deferred vested participants. The PBGC receivedone comment on this surrogate. That commenter objected to the surrogateon the basis that it would overstate benefit values for a plan with a lowpercentage of active participants. The commenter suggested that plans bepermitted, as an alternative to the 7% surrogate, to use the value of theprior plan year's accruals as calculated for purposes of determining the``150% of current liability'' full funding limit (Code section 412(c)(7)(A)(i)(I)).The PBGC has not adopted this suggestion because the calculation is notrequired to be reported on the Schedule B. The PBGC has decided to include the 7% surrogate in the final regulation.Except for the above comment, the PBGC received no comments that objectedto the use of the 7% surrogate or that suggested an alternative approach.While this surrogate will not be a precise measure of the prior plan year'saccruals for each plan, the use of a surrogate that would be more reflectiveof each plan's population and benefit structure would involve substantialcomplications and would thus defeat the primary goal of keeping the alternativecalculation method relatively simple. Those plans that believe they aredisadvantaged by the use of the 7% surrogate are free to use the generalrule. The PBGC received numerous inquiries from plan administrators in connectionwith 1988 premium filings, regarding the computations required for themathematical term, .94(RIR^BIR), in the alternative calculation method'sinterest rate adjustment formula. The PBGC recognizes that persons otherthan actuaries may have difficulty with this term, because it will generallycontain an exponent that is fractional, negative or both. In order to simplifythis computation, the PBGC has developed tables (andSection; 2610.23(c)(3))that convert this term to a ``substitution factor,'' expressed as a decimalfraction carried out to four decimal places. Thus, the user need only selectthe appropriate factor from the tables (based on the difference betweenthe statutory interest rate and the interest rate used to determine thevalues on the Schedule B) and substitute that factor for the term, .94(RIR^BIR),in the interest rate adjustment formula. The PBGC has rounded all substitution factors up or down, as appropriate,whichever produces the higher value of vested benefits. The impact of thisrounding, however, is minimal for any given plan; at most, it would leadto an increase in the value of vested benefits of just under 1%. The useof this table is optional, and is effective beginning with the 1989 premiumpayment year.The PBGC has received a number of inquiries from plan administrators attemptingto complete 1988 premium filings for plans that have terminated, or thatare in the process of doing so. These inquiries fall into two categories.First, in the case of standard terminations with proposed termination datesfalling on or before the statutory date for determining unfunded vestedbenefits, plan administrators have argued that the PBGC should not imposeany variable rate premium because the plan must provide funding for allbenefits in order to satisfy the requirements for a standard termination.Second, in the case of distress and involuntary terminations in which theplan does not have a Schedule B for the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year, plan administrators have expressed concern that, becauseof the unavailability of the Schedule B needed for the alternative calculationmethod, they must incur the expense of a general rule determination.The PBGC believes these concerns are valid and has, therefore, made twochanges in the final premium regulation in response to these inquiries.First, a new variable rate exemption (andSection; 2610.24(a)(4)) exemptsa plan from the variable rate portion of the premium if the plan is terminatingin a standard termination with a proposed termination date during a planyear preceding the premium payment year. This exemption is conditional,subject to the plan's actually closing out in a standard termination. Ifthe plan does not complete the standard termination and, thus, becomesan ongoing plan again, the unpaid variable rate portion(s) of the premium(s)will be due and payable with interest and, unless waived by the PBGC, penalties.In addition, the PBGC is adopting a new special rule (andSection; 2610.24(c))applicable to plans undergoing distress or involuntary terminations withtermination dates during a plan year preceding the premium payment year.These plans may use the Schedule B filed for the plan year in which thetermination date fell, or, if the Schedule B for that plan year is notfiled, the Schedule B for the preceding plan year, as the basis for thealternative calculation method. Both of these new rules are effective beginningwith the 1989 premium payment year.Finally, one commenter suggested that the PBGC not make reference in thepremium regulation to specific line numbers on the Schedule B, since theseline numbers may change and thus require a corresponding change in thepremium regulation. The PBGC recognizes that the referenced line numbersmay change, but has nonetheless decided to use specific line numbers inthe premium regulation in the interest of ease of reference for premiumpayers.Section 2610.23(d)_Restrictions on Alternative Calculation Method for LargePlansOne commenter requested guidance on how to perform the alternative calculationmethod in the case of a plan into which another plan has merged. If themerged plan has 500 or more participants, the merger (except if <T3>de minimis</T3>) must be recognized as a ``significant event'' requiringan appropriate adjustment by an enrolled actuary to the value of unfundedvested benefits. As is the case with all significant events, the enrolledactuary must make this adjustment in a manner consistent with generallyaccepted actuarial principles and practices. Thus, the various assumptionsand formulae in the alternative calculation method may not be used as a``safe harbor'' in making this adjustment.One commenter argued that two of the proposed significant events_andSection;2610.23(d)(4) (dealing with certain shutdowns) and andSection; 2610.23(d)(5)(dealing with certain early retirement windows)_are not automatically significantand thus should be deleted, with the result that they would be reflectedonly in the catch-all significant event in andSection; 2610.23(d)(7). ThePBGC recognizes that these two significant events will not result in allcases in a material increase in the value of unfunded vested benefits.Nonetheless, the PBGC believes that these events are of sufficient importanceto require in all cases that an actuary determine their impact for premiumpurposes. Accordingly, the PBGC has retained these significant events inthe final regulation.Another commenter suggested that the PBGC delete the catch-all significantevent in andSection; 2610.23(d)(7) because it is too nebulous. While thePBGC has attempted to specify those significant events that are most likelyto result in a material increase in the value of unfunded vested benefits,it is impossible to predict all such events. The PBGC finds that it is,therefore, necessary to retain andSection; 2610.23(d)(7). Section 2610.24_Variable Rate Exemptions and Special RulesTwo commenters objected to the PBGC's elimination of the ``$5 rule'' underthe interim regulation for plans with fewer than 100 participants thathad not reported the Schedule B data needed to use the alternative calculationmethod for the 1988 premium payment year. As the PBGC noted in the preambleto the proposed rule, the $5 rule was a temporary measure that is no longernecessary beginning with the 1989 premium payment year, because all plans,regardless of size, are now required to report on the Schedule B the dataneeded to use the alternative calculation method. The PBGC does not believethat the alternative calculation method is so burdensome for small plansas to justify retention of the $5 rule.One commenter expressed concern that the PBGC not eliminate the $5 rulebefore the IRS finalizes the related change to Schedule B reporting requirements.While the Schedule B change was not yet final when the PBGC proposed thedeletion of the $5 rule, it is in effect now.Another commenter suggested that the PBGC impose certain restrictions onthe use of the actuarial certification option (andSection; 2610.24(a)(1))and on the use of the special rule permitting the enrolled actuary to reportthe value of accrued benefits in lieu of the value of vested benefits ifthe value of plan assets exceeds the value of accrued benefits (andSection;2610.24(b)). Under the suggested restrictions, these options would be availableonly to plans using interest rates that do not exceed the statutory rateby a specified percentage, with that percentage linked to the plan's fundinglevel. The PBGC does not believe that such restrictions are necessary.Under the regulation, the enrolled actuary may select these options onlywhen the pertinent regulatory criteria are met, irrespective of the plan'sinterest rate or funding level. The PBGC expects to be able to monitorand to ensure compliance with these requirements through appropriate audits.Section 2610.25_Filing RequirementFour commenters requested that the filing deadline for the variable rateportion of the premium (which is September 15, 1989, for calendar yearplans paying 1989 premiums) be changed to conform to the filing deadlinefor the prior plan year's Schedule B (which is generally September 15,1989, for calendar year plans filing their 1988 Schedule B's, with extensionsavailable to October 15, 1989). The PBGC has not adopted this suggestion.Prior to enactment of the Pension Protection Act, PBGC premiums were dueby the last day of the second month following the close of the prior planyear for large plans and by the last day of the seventh month followingthe close of the prior plan year for all other plans. With the enactmentof the variable rate premium, however, it was apparent that the due date,at least for large plans, would have to be deferred. When the PBGC beganto develop the new premium regulation and decided to give plans the optionto use the Schedule B data as the basis for the premium calculation, italso decided to defer the premium due date for plans with fewer than 500participants in order to approximate more closely the filing schedule forForm 5500. However, in deciding to defer the premium due date, the PBGC also had togive close consideration to the impact this decision would have on itsrevenues. At a time when a major increase in premium rates was needed inorder to preserve the solvency of the single-employer insurance system,the PBGC had to be very cautious in implementing rules that would havea negative impact on premium revenues. For this reason, the PBGC dismissedthe idea of allowing plans to pay their premiums (or the variable rateportion of the premium in the case of large plans) at whatever filing deadlinethey had for the Form 5500. (Such a rule would also have created significantadministrative burdens for the PBGC, because it would never know in advancewhat premium due date plans would be using. Plan administrators, too, wouldbe disadvantaged by this uncertainty.) The PBGC instead settled on a due date of the fifteenth day of the eighthcalendar month following the month in which the premium payment year began(September 15 for calendar year plans). This date was chosen in recognitionof the fact that many corporations routinely obtain the automatic extensionof the due date for corporate tax returns, from March 15 to September 15for calendar year tax years, and for corporate plan sponsors this automaticallymoves the Form 5500 due date to September 15. While September 15 is, thus, the Form 5500 due date for a great numberof premium payers, the PBGC recognizes that a significant number of plansdo extend their Form 5500 due date to October 15. Nevertheless, the ScheduleB data needed for the alternative calculation method ought to be, and generallyis, available by the September 15 premium deadline. Under the alternativecalculation method, it is not necessary that the Schedule B be filed beforethe PBGC Form 1 is completed and filed. Premium calculations can be basedon the Schedule B data that is expected to be reported. While an amended premium filing is required if that data, as ultimatelyreported on the Schedule B, is different, interest and penalties may beassessed only if the premium paid by the filing deadline is less than thatrequired. A number of plan professionals have asked the PBGC whether it is necessaryfor a plan to distribute excess assets in order for the premium obligationto cease accruing. Under section 4007(a) of ERISA and andSection; 2610.25(e)of the proposed rule, the obligation to pay premiums continues throughthe plan year in which all plan assets are distributed pursuant to a plan'stermination or in which a trustee is appointed under section 4042 of ERISA,whichever occurs first. For purposes of this rule, a plan's assets areconsidered distributed pursuant to a termination procedure upon the distributionof all assets that must be allocated to Priority Categories 1 through 6of ERISA section 4044(a), irrespective of whether there are any assetsto be allocated and distributed under ERISA section 4044(d). Finally, the PBGC has had difficulty in securing voluntary compliance withpremium requirements in a number of cases involving terminating plans.Plan professionals involved in such cases are reminded that failure topay premiums in accordance with these requirements may lead to a numberof adverse consequences, including the addition of penalties and interestto the amount of the premium and the initiation of a lawsuit by the PBGCagainst any or all of the plan administrator, the contributing sponsor,and members of the contributing sponsor's controlled group. In addition,ERISA section 4003(e)(5) provides that, ``[i]n any action brought under[Title IV of ERISA], whether to collect premiums, penalties and interestunder section 4007 or for any other purpose, the court may award to the[PBGC] all or a portion of the costs of litigation incurred by the [PBGC]in connection with such action.'' The PBGC intends to pursue these remedies,as appropriate, in order to ensure compliance with the premium regulation.<ITAG tagnum="84">E.O. 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>The PBGC has determined that this rule is a ``major rule'' within the meaningof Executive Order 12291, February 17, 1981 (46 FR 13193) because the single-employerplan premium increase implemented in this regulation will have an annualeffect on the economy of more than $100 million. ln accordance with E.O.12291, the PBGC has prepared a Regulatory Impact Analysis. Interested personsmay obtain copies of the Regulatory Impact Analysis from the PBGC's Communicationsand Public Affairs Department (Code 38000), 2020 K Street, NW., Washington,DC 20006. Under section 605(b) of the Regulatory Flexibility Act, the PBGC certifiesthat these rules will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. The purpose and effect of this regulation isto provide rules for calculating the premium owed under ERISA section 4006.The costs attendant thereto for small pension plans (those with fewer than100 participants) will not be significant, since virtually all such planswill either use the simplified calculation method or will be exempt fromperforming the calculation. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects 29 CFR Part 2610 </ITAG>Employee benefit plans, Penalties, Pension insurance, Pensions, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.In consideration of the foregoing, Part 2610 of Chapter XXVI of Title 29,Code of Federal Regulations, is revised as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 2610_PAYMENT OF PREMIUMS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.1 Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.2 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.3 Forms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.4 Mailing address. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.5 Date of filing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.6 Computation of time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.7 Late payment interest charges. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.8 Late payment penalty charges. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.9 Coverage for guaranteed basic benefits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.10 Special rule for certain mergers and spinoffs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.11 Recordkeeping requirements; PBGC audits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Single-Employer Premiums for Post-1987 Plan Years </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.21 Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.22 Premium rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.23 Determination of unfunded vested benefits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.24 Variable rate exemptions and special rules. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.25 Filing requirement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.26 Liability for premiums. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Single-Employer Premiums for Pre-1988 Plan Years; MultiemployerPremiums </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.31 Purpose and scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.32 Single-employer premium rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.33 Multiemployer premium rates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2610.34 Filing requirement.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Appendix A to Part 2610_Late Payment Interest Charges </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Appendix B to Part 2610_Interest Rates For Valuing Vested Benefits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>29 U.S.C. 1302(b)(3), 1306, 1307, as amended by sec.9331, Pub.L. 100-203, 101 Stat. 1330. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose</T3>. The purpose of this part is to provide rules for computingand procedures for paying the premiums imposed by sections 4006 and 4007of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. SubpartA contains the rules that apply both to single-employer and multiemployerplans with respect to all plan years. These general rules cover such mattersas the definitions of terms under this part, procedural requirements, andlate payment interest and penalty charges. Subpart B contains the premiumrates and due dates and computational rules for single-employer plans underthe variable rate premium structure enacted as part of the Pension ProtectionAct. These rules apply to single-employer plans for plan years beginningon or after January 1, 1988 (except as otherwise specifically noted). SubpartC contains the premium rates and due dates for single-employer plans withrespect to all prior plan years and for multiemployer plans with respectto all plan years. (b) <T3>Scope</T3>. This part applies to all plans that are covered by TitleIV of the Act pursuant to section 4021 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this part:``Act'' means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.``Code'' means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.``Multiemployer plan'' means a plan defined in section 4001(a)(3) of theAct.``New plan'' means a plan that became effective within the premium paymentyear and includes a plan resulting from a consolidation or spinoff. A planthat meets this definition is considered to be a new plan for purposesof this part even if the plan constitutes a successor plan within the meaningof section 4021(a) of the Act.``Newly covered plan'' means a plan that is not a new plan and that wasnot covered by Title IV of the Act pursuant to section 4021 of the Actimmediately prior to the premium payment year.``Participant'' means any individual who is included in one of the categoriesbelow: (a) <T3>Active.</T3> (1) Any individual who is currently in employment covered by the plan andwho is earning or retaining credited service under the plan. This categoryincludes any individual who is considered covered under the plan for purposesof meeting the minimum coverage requirements, but because of offset orother provisions (including integration with Social Security benefits),the individual does not have any accrued benefits. (2) Any non-vested individual who is not currently in employment coveredby the plan but who is earning or retaining credited service under theplan. This category does not include a non-vested former employee who hasincurred a break in service the greater of one year or the break in serviceperiod specified in the plan. (b) <T3>Inactive_</T3>(1) <T3>Inactive receiving benefits.</T3> Any individual who is retired orseparated from employment covered by the plan and who is receiving benefitsunder the plan. This category does not include an individual to whom aninsurer has made an irrevocable commitment to pay all the benefits to whichthe individual is entitled under the plan. (2) <T3>Inactive entitled to future benefits.</T3> Any individual who is retiredor separated from employment covered by the plan and who is entitled tobegin receiving benefits under the plan in the future. This category doesnot include an individual to whom an insurer has made an irrevocable commitmentto pay all the benefits to which the individual is entitled under the plan.(c) <T3>Deceased.</T3> Any deceased individual who has one or more beneficiarieswho are receiving or entitled to receive benefits under the plan. Thiscategory does not include an individual if an insurer has made an irrevocablecommitment to pay all the benefits to which the beneficiaries of that individualare entitled under the plan. <T3>Provided that,</T3> for plan years beginning before September 2, 1975,a retiree or former employee for whom a fully paid-up immediate or deferredannuity has been purchased shall be treated as a ``participant'' if suchindividual retains a legal claim against the plan for benefits or if theplan retains a participating interest in the annuity policy. ``PBGC'' means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.``Plan year'' means the calendar, policy or fiscal year on which the recordsof the plan are kept. ``Premium payment year'' means the plan year for which the premium is beingpaid. ``Short plan year'' means a plan year that is less than twelve full months.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Forms. </ITAG>The estimation, declaration, reconciliation and payment of premiums shallbe made using the forms prescribed by and in accordance with the instructionsin the PBGC Annual Premium Payment Package. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mailing address. </ITAG>Plan administrators shall mail all forms required to be filed under thispart and all payments for premiums, interest and penalties required tobe made under this part to: Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation, P.O.Box 105655, Atlanta, GA 30348-5655 or, if hand-delivered, to Retail LockboxProcessing Center, 1740 Phoenix Parkway, PBGC Lockbox 105655, College Park,GA 30349. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Date of filing. </ITAG>(a) Any form required to be filed under the provisions of this part andany payment required to be made under the provisions of this part shallbe deemed to have been filed or made on the date on which it is mailed.(b) A form or payment shall be presumed to have been mailed on the dateon which it is postmarked by the United States Postal Service, or threedays prior to the date on which it is received by the PBGC if it does notcontain a legible United States Postal Service postmark. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of time. </ITAG>In computing any period of time prescribed by this part, the day of theact, event, or default from which the designated period of time beginsto run is not counted. The last day of the period so computed shall beincluded, unless it is a Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday, in whichevent the period runs until the end of the next day that is not a Saturday,Sunday, or federal holiday. For purposes of computing late payment interestcharges under andSection; 2610.7 and late payment penalty charges under andSection;2610.8, a Saturday, Sunday or federal holiday referred to in the previoussentence shall be included. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Late payment interest charges.</ITAG>(a) If any premium payment due under this part is not paid by the due dateprescribed for such payment by andSection; 2610.25 or andSection; 2610.34,as applicable, an interest charge will accrue on the unpaid amount at therate imposed under section 6601(a) of the Code for the period from thedate payment is due to the date payment is made. Late payment interestcharges accrue as simple interest before January 1, 1983, and thereafterare compounded daily. (The interest rates for specified time periods areset forth in Appendix A to this part.) (b) When PBGC issues a bill for premium payments necessary to reconcilethe premiums paid with the actual premium due, interest will be accruedon the unpaid premium until the date of the bill if paid no later than30 days after the date of such bill. If the bill is not paid within the30-day period following the date of such bill, interest will continue toaccrue throughout such 30-day period and thereafter, until the date paid.(c) PBGC bills for interest assessed under this section will be deemedpaid when due if paid no later than 30 days after the date of such bills.Otherwise, interest will accrue in accordance with paragraph (a) of thissection on the amount of the bill from the date of the bill until the dateof payment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Late payment penalty charges. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Penalty charge.</T3> If any premium payment due under this part isnot paid by the due date prescribed for such payment by andSection; 2610.25or 2610.34, as applicable, the PBGC will, unless a waiver is granted pursuantto paragraph (b) of this section, assess a late payment charge on the unpaidpremium at the rate provided in paragraph (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) ofthis section, as applicable. (1) If the due date for the premium is prior to October 2, 1975, the latepayment charge shall be at the rate specified in the following table: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,16</C> <H1>Days late from due date</H1><H1>Late payment charge (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1 to 60<D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">61 to 90<D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91 to 120<D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">121 to 180<D>75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">More than 180<D>1000</D></ITAG></ITAG>(2) If the due date for the premium is on or after October 2, 1975, andbefore July 31, 1984, the late payment charge shall be at the rate specifiedin the following table:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,16</C> <H1>Days late from due date </H1><H1>Late payment charge (percent) </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1 to 30<D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">31 to 60<D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">61 to 90<D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">91 to 120<D>40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">121 to 150<D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">151 to 180<D>80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">More than 180<D>100</D></ITAG></ITAG>(3) If the due date for the premium is on or after July 31, 1984, the latepayment charge (not to exceed 100% of the unpaid premium) shall be equalto the greater of_(i) 5% per month (or fraction thereof) of the unpaid premiums; or(ii) $25.(b) <T3>Waiver of penalty charge.</T3> The late payment penalty charge willbe waived, in whole or in part_(1) With respect to any premium payment made within 60 days after the duedate prescribed for such payment in andSection; 2610.25 or andSection; 2610.34,as applicable, if, before such due date, the PBGC grants a waiver upona showing of substantial hardship arising from the timely payment of thepremium and a showing that the premium will be paid within such 60-dayperiod;(2) If the PBGC grants a waiver based on any other demonstration of goodcause;(3) If the PBGC, on its own motion, waives the application of paragraph(a) of this section;(4) With respect to any premium payment (excluding any variable rate portionof the premium under andSection; 2610.22(a)(2)), if a plan that is requiredto make a reconciliation filing described in andSection; 2610.25(b)(2)(iii)or andSection; 2610.34(b)_(i) Paid at least 90 percent of the flat rate portion of the premium duefor the premium payment year by the due date specified in andSection; 2610.25(b)(2)(i)or andSection; 2610.34(b); or(ii) Paid by the due date specified in andSection; 2610.25(b)(2)(i) or andSection;2610.34(b) an amount equal to the premium that would be due for the premiumpayment year, computed using the flat per capita premium rate for the premiumpayment year and the participant count upon which the prior year's premiumwas based; and(iii) Pays 100 percent of the premium due for the premium payment yearunder andSection; 2610.22 (excluding any variable rate portion of the premiumunder andSection; 2610.22(a)(2)), andSection; 2610.32, or andSection; 2610.33,as applicable, on or before the due date for the reconciliation filingunder andSection; 2610.25(b)(2)(iii) or andSection; 2610.34(b), as applicable;or(5) With respect to any PBGC bills for the premium payment necessary toreconcile the premium paid with the actual premium due, if such bills arepaid no later than 30 days after the date of such bills.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Coverage for guaranteed basic benefits.</ITAG>(a) The failure by a plan administrator to pay the premiums due under thispart will not result in that plan's loss of coverage for basic benefitsguaranteed under sections 4022(a) or 4022A(a) of the Act.(b) The payment of the premiums imposed by this part will not result incoverage for basic benefits guaranteed under sections 4022(a) or 4022A(a)of the Act for plans not covered under Title IV of the Act pursuant tosection 4021 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special rule for certain mergers and spinoffs.</ITAG>(a) With respect to a plan described in paragraph (b) of this section thatis paying its premium for a premium payment year beginning on or afterJanuary 1, 1988, all references in andSection;andSection; 2610.22, 2610.23,2610.24 and 2610.33, as applicable, to the last day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year shall be deemed to refer to the first day of thepremium payment year.(b) A plan is described in this paragraph if_(1) The plan engages in a merger or spinoff that is not <T3>de minimis </T3>pursuant to the regulations under section 414(1) ofthe Code (in the case of single-employer plans) or pursuant to Part 2672of this chapter (in the case of multiemployer plans), as applicable; (2) The merger or spinoff is effective on the first day of the plan's premiumpayment year; and (3) The plan is the transferee plan in the case of a merger or the transferorplan in the case of a spinoff. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Recordkeeping requirements; PBGC audits. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Retention of records to support premium payments. </T3>With respectto plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1988, all plan records,including calculations and other data prepared by an enrolled actuary or,for a plan described in section 412(i) of the Code, by the insurer fromwhich the insurance contracts are purchased, that are necessary to supportor to validate premium payments under this part shall be retained by theplan administrator for a period of six years after the premium due date.Records that must be retained pursuant to this paragraph include, but arenot limited to, records that establish the number of plan participants,that reconcile the calculation of the plan's unfunded vested benefits withthe actuarial valuation upon which the calculation was based, and, forplans that assert entitlement to the reduction in the cap on the variablerate portion of the premium, that demonstrate the methods and assumptionsused by the plan during the base period with respect to calculating itsmaximum deductible contribution pursuant to section 404 of the Code. Recordsretained pursuant to this paragraph shall be made available to the PBGCupon request for inspection and photocopying. (b) <T3>PBGC audit. </T3>Premium payments under this part are subject to auditby the PBGC. If, upon audit, the PBGC determines that a premium due underthis part was underpaid, the late payment interest charges under andSection;2610.7 and the late payment penalty charges under andSection; 2610.8 shallapply to the unpaid balance from the premium due date to the date of payment.In determining the premium due_(1) If, in the judgment of the PBGC, the plan's records fail to establishthe number of plan participants with respect to whom premiums were requiredfor any premium payment year, the PBGC may rely on data it obtains fromother sources (including the Internal Revenue Ser6ice and the Departmentof Labor) for presumptively establishing the number of plan participantsfor premium computation purposes; and (2) If, in the judgment of the PBGC, the plan's records fail to establishthat the 0lan's unfunded vested benefits were of the amount reported bythe plan for the premium payment year, the variable rate portion of thepremium owed by the plan with respect to that premium payment may be deemedto be the maximum $34 per participant charge, pursuant to andSection; 2610.22(a)(3).<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control no.1212-0009.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Single-Employer Premiums for Post-1987 Plan Years </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG>This subpart provides rules for computing and procedures for paying premiumsfor single-employer plans with respect to plan years beginning, generally,on or after January 1, 1988. Certain provisions, as specifically noted,apply to plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1989. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Premium rate. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>For plan years beginning on or after January 1,1988, the premium paid by a single-employer plan for basic benefits guaranteedunder section 4022(a) of the Act shall equal the sum of the amounts inparagraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section (subject to the limitationin paragraph (a)(3) of this section), multiplied by the number of participantsin the plan on the last day of the plan year preceding the premium paymentyear. (1) <T3>Flat rate amount. </T3>The amount under this paragraph is $16. (2) <T3>Variable rate amount. </T3>Except for plans covered by an exemptionor special rule pursuant to andSection; 2610.24, the amount under this paragraphis $6 for each $1,000 (or fraction thereof) of a plan's unfunded vestedbenefits, as determined under andSection; 2610.23, with that product dividedby the number of participants in the plan on the last day of the plan yearpreceding the premium payment year. The resulting amount shall be roundedto the nearest cent, with a fraction of one-half cent or more rounded upand a fraction of less than one-half cent rounded down. (3) <T3>Cap on variable rate amount. </T3>Except as modified by the next sentence,in no event shall the variable rate amount determined under paragraph (a)(2)of this section exceed $34 per participant. For each of the five consecutivepremium payment years commencing with the first premium payment year beginningon or after January 1, 1988, the $34 maximum shall be reduced by the productof $3 multiplied by the number of plan years during the last five planyears commencing before January 1, 1988, with respect to which the contributingsponsor or contributing sponsors made contributions to the plan in an amountnot less than the maximum amount allowable as a deduction under section404 of the Code, as determined in accordance with paragraphs (a)(3)(i)through (a)(3)(v) of this section. The rules in paragraphs (a)(3)(ii),(a)(3)(iii) and (a)(3)(v) apply with respect to plan years beginning onor after January 1, 1989. (i) <T3>Determination of maximum deductible contribution. </T3>The determinationof whether contributions were in an amount not less than the maximum amountallowable as a deduction under section 404 of the Code shall be based onthe methods of computing the maximum deductible contribution under section404, including actuarial assumptions and funding methods, used by the planand the contributing sponsor or contributing sponsors (provided such assumptionsand methods met the requirements for reasonableness under section 412 ofthe Code) with respect to each of the last five plan years commencing beforeJanuary l, 1988. (ii) <T3>Special rule for rounding of de minimis amounts. </T3>Any contributionthat is rounded down to no less than the next lower multiple of one hundreddollars (in the case of maximum deductible amounts up to one hundred thousanddollars) or to no less than the next lower multiple of one thousand dollars(in the case of maximum deductible amounts above one hundred thousand dollars)shall be deemed for purposes of this paragraph to be in an amount not lessthat the maximum deductible amount. (iii) <T3>Determination of maximum deductible contribution for sponsors maintainingdefined benefit and defined contribution plans. </T3>For purposes of thisparagraph, if a contributing sponsor is subject to the limitation on deductionsdescribed in section 404(a)(7)(A) of the Code (relating to total deductionsin connection with one or more defined contribution plans and one or moredefined benefit plans with common participants in each) and if the contributingsponsor or contributing sponsors made contributions to the plan with respectto which the premium is being determined in an amount less than the maximumdeductible amount (determined without regard to the Code section 404(a)(7)(A)limitation), amounts contributed to a defined contribution plan (or plans),or to a defined benefit plan (or plans) not covered by Title IV of theAct pursuant to section 4021 of the Act, shall be disregarded in determiningwhether the amounts contributed equalled the maximum deductible contributionunder section 404 of the Code. If the contributing sponsor maintains morethan one defined benefit plan covered by Title IV of the Act pursuant tosection 4021 of the Act, the determination shall be made by aggregatingthe amounts contributed to all such plans and comparing that total to thesection 404(a)(7)(A) limitation.(iv) <T3>Determination of maximum deductible contribution in certain cases whenplan year and taxable year do not coincide. </T3>If a contributing sponsordetermined the maximum deductible contribution for a taxable year by usinga weighted average of the maximum deductible contributions for the planyears falling within the taxable year pursuant to 26 CFR 1.404(a)-14(c)(3),the determination under this paragraph of whether the contribution fora plan year was the maximum deductible amount shall be made by aggregatingall contributions for the plan year, irrespective of the taxable year inwhich they were applied. If this total is less than the maximum deductibleamount under Code section 404 (without applying the limitation in Codesection 404(a)(7)(A)) determined on the basis of the plan year, the contributionshall be treated as being the maximum deductible amount under this paragraphonly if the portion of the contribution applied in each taxable year inwhich the plan year fell equalled the maximum deductible amount (with respectto that plan year) for that taxable year under the limitation in section404(a)(7)(A). (v) <T3>Special rule for nonprofit entities. </T3>A plan maintained by a nonprofitentity shall be deemed, for purposes of paragraph (a)(3) of this section,to have received the maximum deductible amount for a plan year if an enrolledactuary certifies that the contributions made to the plan for that planyear were in an amount not less than the maximum amount that would havebeen allowable as a deduction under section 404 of the Code, as determinedunder paragraphs (a)(3)(i) through (a)(3)(iv) of this section, if the contributingsponsor(s) of the plan was a (were) for-profit entity(ies). (b) <T3>Special computation date for new and newly covered plans. </T3>Forpurposes of this section, the number of plan participants for purposesof computing the premium owed with respect to a new plan or a newly coveredplan (as defined in andSection; 2610.2) shall be determined as of the firstday of the premium payment year or, if later, the date on which the planbecame effective for benefit accruals for future service, and all referencesin paragraph (a) of this section to the last day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year shall be deemed to refer to such day or date.(c) <T3>Plans that change plan years. </T3>A plan that changes its plan yearshall pay the premium prescribed by this section for the short plan year.(d) <T3>Special refund rule for certain short plan years. </T3>A plan describedin this paragraph is entitled to a refund for a short plan year that beginson or after January 1, 1989. The plan must pay the full premium due andrequest a refund from the PBGC. The amount of the refund will be determinedby prorating the premium for the short plan year by the number of months(treating a part of a month as a month) in the short plan year. A planis described in this paragraph if_ (1) The plan is a new or newly covered plan that becomes effective forpremium purposes on a date other than the first day of its first plan year;(2) The plan adopts an amendment changing its plan year, resulting in ashort plan year; (3) The plan's assets are distributed pursuant to the plan's termination,in which case the short plan year for purposes of computing the amountof the refund under this paragraph shall be deemed to end on the laterof the asset distribution date or the date 30 days prior to the date thePBGC receives the plan's post-distribution certification; or (4) A trustee of the plan is appointed pursuant to section 4042 of theAct, in which case the short plan year for purposes of computing the amountof the refund under this paragraph shall be deemed to end on the date ofappointment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of unfunded vested benefits. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>Except as permitted by paragraph (c) of this sectionor as provided in the exemptions and special rules under andSection; 2610.24,the amount of a plan's unfunded vested benefits (as defined in paragraph(b) of this section) shall be determined as of the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year, based on the plan provisions andthe plan's population as of that date. The determination shall be madein accordance with paragraph (a)(1) (for premium payment years beginningin 1988) or (a)(2) (for premium payment years beginning on or after January1, 1989), and shall be certified to in accordance with paragraph (a)(3).(1) <T3>Determination for 1988 premium payment years. </T3>The determinationof vested benefits shall be based on a plan valuation that meets the requirementsimposed by section 302(c)(9) of the Act and section 412(c)(9) of the Code,and that was performed as of the first day of the premium payment yearor that was the most recent valuation performed (by on or before the datethe variable rate portion of the premium for the premium payment year isdue under andSection; 2610.25) for a plan year within the three plan yearsimmediately preceding the premium payment year. If a significant eventdescribed in paragraph (d) of this section or other event that has a materialimpact on the value of vested benefits occurred between the date of theplan valuation and the last day of the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year, the value of vested benefits shall be determined using assumptionsthat reflect the occurrence of such significant event. If the plan valuationon which the determination of vested benefits is based was performed asof the first day of the premium payment year, the amount of the plan'svested benefits as of such date shall be deemed to equal the amount ofthe plan's vested benefits as of the last day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year unless the plan's enrolled actuary determinesthat there is a material difference between such amounts. (2) <T3>Determination for post-1988 premium payment years. </T3>The unfundedvested benefits shall be determined using the same actuarial assumptionsand methods used by the plan for purposes of determining the minimum fundingcontribution under section 302 of the Act and section 412 of the Code forthe plan year preceding the premium payment year (or, in the case of anew or newly covered plan, for the premium payment year), except to theextent that other actuarial assumptions are specifically prescribed bythis section or are necessary to reflect the occurrence of a significantevent described in paragraph (d) of this section between the date of thefunding valuation and the last day of the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. (If the plan does a valuation as of the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year, no separate adjustment for significantevents is needed.) Under this rule, the determination of the unfunded vestedbenefits may be based on a plan valuation done as of the first day of thepremium payment year, provided that_(i) The actuarial assumptions and methods used are those used by the planfor purposes of determining the minimum funding contribution under section302 of the Act and section 412 of the Code for the premium payment year,except to the extent that other actuarial assumptions are specificallyprescribed by this section or are required to make the adjustment describedin paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of this section; and (ii) If an enrolled actuary determines that there is a material differencebetween the values determined under the valuation and the values that wouldhave been determined as of the last day of the preceding plan year, thevaluation results are adjusted to reflect appropriately the values as ofthe last day of the preceding plan year. (This adjustment need not be madeif the unadjusted valuation would result in greater unfunded vested benefits.)(3) In the case of any plan that determines the amount of its unfundedvested benefits under the general rule described in this paragraph, anenrolled actuary must certify, in accordance with the Premium Payment Package,that the determination was made in a manner consistent with generally acceptedactuarial principles and practices. (b) <T3>Unfunded vested benefits</T3>. The amount of a plan's unfunded vestedbenefits under this section shall be the excess of the plan's vested benefitsamount (determined under paragraph (b)(1) of this section) over the actuarialvalue of the plan's assets (determined under paragraph (b)(2) of this section).(1) <T3>Vested benefits amount</T3>. A plan's vested benefits amount underthis section shall be the plan's current liability (within the meaningof section 302(d)(7) of the Act) determined by taking into account onlyvested benefits and by using an interest rate equal to 80% of the annualyield for 30-year Treasury constant maturities, as reported in FederalReserve Statistical Release G.13 and H.15, for the calendar month precedingthe calendar month in which the premium payment year begins. (AppendixB to this part sets forth the required intereat rates.) For premium paymentyears beginning on or after January 1, 1989, if the interest rate (or rates)used by the plan to determine current liability was (or were all) not greaterthan the required interest rate, the vested benefits need not be revaluedif an enrolled actuary certifies that the interest rate (or interest rates)used was (or were all) not greater than the required interest rate. (2) <T3>Actuarial value of assets</T3>. The actuarial value of a plan's assetsunder this section shall be determined in accordance with section 302(c)(2)of the Act, except that the value is not reduced by a credit balance inthe funding standard account. Contributions owed for any plan year precedingthe premium payment year shall be included for premium payment years beginningduring 1988 and, for premium payment years beginning on or after January1, 1989, shall be included for plans with 500 or more participants andmay be included for any other plan. However, contributions may be includedonly to the extent such contributions have been paid into the plan on orbefore the earlier of the due date for payment of the variable rate portionof the premium under andSection; 2610.25 or the date that portion is paid.Contributions included that are paid after the last day of the plan yearpreceding the premium payment year shall be discounted at the plan assetvaluation rate (on a simple or compound basis in accordance with the plan'sdiscounting rules) to such last day to reflect the date(s) of payment.Contributions for the premium payment year may not be included for anyplan. (c) <T3>Alternative method for calculating unfunded vested benefits</T3>. Inlieu of determining the amount of the plan's unfunded vested benefits pursuantto paragraph (a) of this section, a plan administrator may calculate theamount of a plan's unfunded vested benefits under this paragraph usingthe plan's Form 5500, Schedule B, for the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. Pursuant to this paragraph, unfunded vested benefits shallbe determined from the entries in lines 6d(i), 6d(ii) and, usually, 8bof the plan's Schedule B. The value of the vested benefits shall be adjustedin accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section (for premium paymentyears beginning on or after January 1, 1989) to reflect accruals duringthe plan year preceding the premium payment year and with paragraph (c)(2)of this section to reflect the interest rate prescribed in paragraph (b)(1)of this section, and the value of the assets shall be adjusted in accordanoewith paragraph (c)(4) of this section. (For premium payment years beginningon or after January 1, 1989, if the plan administrator certifies that theinterest rate (or rates) used to determine the values in lines 6d(i) and6d(ii) of the Schedule B was (or were all) not greater than the interestrate prescribed in paragraph (b)(1) of this section, the interest rateadjustment prescribed in paragraph (c)(2) of this section is not required.)The resulting unfunded vested benefits amount shall be adjusted in accordancewith paragraph (c)(5) of this section to reflect the passage of time fromthe date of the Schedule B data to the last day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year. (1) <T3>Vested benefits adjustment for accruals. </T3>For premium payment yearsbeginning on or after January 1, 1989, the value of vested benefits enteredin line 6d(ii) shall be adjusted to reflect the increase in vested benefitsattributable to accruals during the plan year preceding the premium paymentyear by multiplying that value by 1.07.(2) <T3>Vested benefits interest rate adjustment. </T3>The value of vestedbenefits as entered on the Schedule B shall be adjusted in accordance withthe following formula (except as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section)to reflect the interest rate prescribed in paragraph (b)(1) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="26">VB<T2>adj</T2>=VB<T2>6d(i)</T2>andmultiply; .94(RIR^BIR)+VB<T2>6d(ii)</T2>andmultiply;.94(RIR^BIR)andmultiply;((100+BIA)/(100+ RIR))(ARA^50);where_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) VB<T2>adj</T2> is the adjusted vested benefits amount (as of the first dayof the plan year preceding the premium payment year) under the alternativecalculation method;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) VB<T2>6d(i)</T2> is the amount entered in line 6d(i) of the Schedule B;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) VB<T2>6(ii)</T2> is the amount entered in line 6d(ii) of the Schedule B,multiplied, for premium payment years beginning on or after January 1,1989, by 1.07 in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) RIR is the required interest rate set forth in Appendix B tothis part;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) BIR is the interest rate entered on line 12c (post-retirement)of the Schedule B that was used to determine the entry on line 6d(i) ofthe Schedule B;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) BIA is the interest rate entered on line 12c (pre-retirement)of the Schedule B that was used to determine the entry in line 6d(ii) ofthe Schedule B: and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) ARA is the assumed retirement age entered on line 12d of theSchedule B that was used to determine the entries on lines 6d(i) and 6d(ii)of the Schedule B.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Optional use of substitution factors in interest rate adjustment formula.</T3>The substitution factor set forth in Table A (when RIR is equaI to or greaterthan BIR rounded to the nearest hundredth) or Table B (when BIR roundedto the nearest hundredth is greater than RIR) below may be used in lieuof the term, .94 (RIR^BIR), in the formula prescribed by paragraph (c)(2)of this section:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,6,5,13</C><T4>Table A</T4><H1>If RIR minus BIR (rounded to nearest hundredth) is:</H1><H2>At least </H2><H2>But less than </H2><H1>The substitution factor is_</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">0.00 <D>0.10 </D><D>1.0000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.10 <D>0.20 </D><D>0.9938</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.20 <D>0.30 </D><D>0.9877</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.30 <D>0.40 </D><D>0.9816</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.40 <D>0.50 </D><D>0.9756</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.50 <D>0.60 </D><D>0.9695</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.60 <D>0.70 </D><D>0.9636</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.70 <D>0.80 </D><D>0.9576</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.80 <D>0.90 </D><D>0.9517</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.90 <D>1.00 </D><D>0.9458</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.00 <D>1.10 </D><D>0.9400</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.10 <D>1.20 </D><D>0.9342</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.20 <D>1.30 </D><D>0.9284</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.30 <D>1.40 </D><D>0.9227</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.40 <D>1.50 </D><D>0.9170</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.50 <D>1.60 </D><D>0.9114</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.60 <D>1.70 </D><D>0.9057</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.70 <D>1.80 </D><D>0.9002</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.80 <D>1.90 </D><D>0.8946</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.90 <D>2.00 </D><D>0.8891</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.00 <D>2.10 </D><D>0.8836</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.10 <D>2.20 </D><D>0.8781</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.20 <D>2.30 </D><D>0.8727</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.30 <D>2.40 </D><D>0.8673</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.40 <D>2.50 </D><D>0.8620</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.50 <D>2.60 </D><D>0.8567</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.60 <D>2.70 </D><D>0.8514</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.70 <D>2.80 </D><D>0.8461</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.80 <D>2.90 </D><D>0.8409</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.90 <D>3.00 </D><D>0.8357</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.00 <D>3.10 </D><D>0.8306</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.10 <D>3.20 </D><D>0.8255</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.20 <D>3.30 </D><D>0.8204</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.30 <D>3.40 </D><D>0.8153</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.40 <D>3.50 </D><D>0.8103</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.50 <D>3.60 </D><D>0.8053</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.60 <D>3.70 </D><D>0.8003</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.70 <D>3.80 </D><D>0.7954</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.80 <D>3.90 </D><D>0.7905</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.90 <D>4.00 </D><D>0.7856</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.00 <D>4.10 </D><D>0.7807</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.10 <D>4.20 </D><D>0.7759</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.20 <D>4.30 </D><D>0.7711</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.30 <D>4.40 </D><D>0.7664</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.40 <D>4.50 </D><D>0.7617</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.50 <D>4.60 </D><D>0.7570</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.60 <D>4.70 </D><D>0.7523</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.70 <D>4.80 </D><D>0.7477</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.80 <D>4.90 </D><D>0.7430</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.90 <D>5.00 </D><D>0.7385</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.00 <D>5.10 </D><D>0.7339</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.10 <D>5.20 </D><D>0.7294</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.20 <D>5.30 </D><D>0.7249</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.30 <D>5.40 </D><D>0.7204</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.40 <D>5.50 </D><D>0.7160</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.50 <D>5.60 </D><D>0.7115</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.60 <D>5.70 </D><D>0.7072</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.70 <D>5.80 </D><D>0.7028</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.80 <D>5.90 </D><D>0.6985</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.90 <D>6.00 </D><D>0.6942</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table B</T4><H1>If BIR (rounded to nearest hundredth) minus RIR is:</H1><H2>At least </H2><H2>But less than </H2><H1>The substitution factor is_</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">0.01 <D>0.10 </D><D>1.0062 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.10 <D>0.20 </D><D>1.0125 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.20 <D>0.30 </D><D>1.0187 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.30 <D>0.40 </D><D>1.0251 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.40 <D>0.50 </D><D>1.0314 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.50 <D>0.60 </D><D>1.0378 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.60 <D>0.70 </D><D>1.0443 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.70 <D>0.80 </D><D>1.0507 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.80 <D>0.90 </D><D>1.0573 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">0.90 <D>1.00 </D><D>1.0638 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.00 <D>1.10 </D><D>1.0704 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.10 <D>1.20 </D><D>1.0771 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.20 <D>1.30 </D><D>1.0838 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.30 <D>1.40 </D><D>1.0905 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.40 <D>1.50 </D><D>1.0973 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.50 <D>1.60 </D><D>1.1041 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.6? <D>1.70 </D><D>1.1109 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.70 <D>1.80 </D><D>1.1178 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.80 <D>1.90 </D><D>1.1248 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.90 <D>2.00 </D><D>1.1317 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.00 <D>2.10 </D><D>1.1388 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.10 <D>2.20 </D><D>1.1458 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.20 <D>2.30 </D><D>1.1529 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.30 <D>2.40 </D><D>1.1601 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.40 <D>2.50 </D><D>1.1673 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.50 <D>2.60 </D><D>1.1745 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.60 <D>2.70 </D><D>1.1818 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.70 <D>2.80 </D><D>1.1892 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.80 <D>2.90 </D><D>1.1965 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2.90 <D>3.00 </D><D>1.2040 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.00 <D>3.10 </D><D>1.2114 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.10 <D>3.20 </D><D>1.2190 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.20 <D>3.30 </D><D>1.2265 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.30 <D>3.40 </D><D>1.2341 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.40 <D>3.50 </D><D>1.2418 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.50 <D>3.60 </D><D>1.2495 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.60 <D>3.70 </D><D>1.2573 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.70 <D>3.80 </D><D>1.2651 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.80 <D>3.90 </D><D>1.2729 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3.90 <D>4.00 </D><D>1.2808 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.00 <D>4.10 </D><D>1.2888 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.10 <D>4.20 </D><D>1.2968 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.20 <D>4.30 </D><D>1.3048 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.30 <D>4.40 </D><D>1.3129 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.40 <D>4.50 </D><D>1.3211 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.50 <D>4.60 </D><D>1.3293 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.60 <D>4.70 </D><D>1.3375 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.70 <D>4.80 </D><D>1.3458 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.80 <D>4.90 </D><D>1.3542 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4.90 <D>5.00 </D><D>1.3626 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.00 <D>5.10 </D><D>1.3710 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.10 <D>5.20 </D><D>1.3795 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.20 <D>5.30 </D><D>1.3881 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.30 <D>5.40 </D><D>1.3967 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.40 <D>5.50 </D><D>1.4054 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.50 <D>5.60 </D><D>1.4141 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.60 <D>5.70 </D><D>1.4229 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.70 <D>5.80 </D><D>1.4317 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.80 <D>5.90 </D><D>1.4406 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5.90 <D>6.00 </D><D>1.4495</D></ITAG></ITAG> (4) <T3>Adjusted value of plan assets. </T3>The value of plan assets shallbe the amount reported on line 8b of the Schedule B, unless that amountwas determined as of a date other than the first day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year. In that event, the value of plan assets shallbe the amount entered in line 6c of the Schedule B. The value of assetsreported on line 8b (or 6c) of the Schedule B shall be adjusted in accordancewith paragraph (b)(2) of this section, except that the amount of all contributionsthat are included in the value of assets and that were made after the firstday of the plan year preceding the premium payment year shall be discountedto such first day at the interest rate listed in Appendix B of this partfor the premium payment year, using any reasonable discounting method forpremium payment years beginning during 1988, and for all subsequent planyears, compounded annually except that simple interest may be used forany partial years. (5) <T3>Adjustment for passage of time. </T3>The amount of the plan's unfundedvested benefits shall be adjusted to reflect the passage of time betweenthe date of the Schedule B data (the first day of the plan year precedingthe premium payment year) and the last day of the plan year preceding thepremium payment year in accordance with the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="26">UVB<T2>adj</T2> = (VB<T2>adj</T2> ^ A<T2>adj</T2>) andmultiply; (1 + RIR/100)Y; where_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) UVB<T2>adj</T2> is the amount of the plan's adjusted unfunded vested benefits;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) VB<T2>adj</T2> is the value of the adjusted vested benefits calculated inaccordance with paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) of this section; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) A<T2>adj</T2> is the adjusted asset amount calculated in accordance withparagraph (c)(3) of this section; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) RIR is the required interest rate set forth in Appendix B tothis part; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Y is deemed to be equal to 1 (unless the plan year preceding thepremium payment year is a short plan year, in which case Y is the numberof years between the first day and the last day of the short plan year,expressed as a decimal fraction of 1.0 with two digits to the right ofthe decimal point).</ITAG>(d) <T3>Restrictions on alternative calculation method for large plans. </T3>Aplan with 500 or more participants as of the last day of the plan yearpreceding the premium payment year may use the alternative calculationmethod described in paragraph (c) of this section only if no significantevent, as described in this paragraph, has occurred between the first dayand the last day of the plan year preceding the premium payment year andan enrolled actuary so certifies in accordance with the Premium PaymentPackage. If a significant event has occurred between those dates, the alternativemethod may be used only if an enrolled actuary makes an appropriate adjustmentto the value of unfunded vested benefits to reflect the occurrence of thesignificant event and certifies to that fact in accordance with the PremiumPayment Package. Significant events described in this paragraph are_ (1) An increase in the plan's actuarial costs (consisting of the plan'snormal cost under section 412(b)(2)(A) of the Code, amortization chargesunder section 412(b)(2)(B) of the Code, and amortization credits undersection 412(b)(3)(B) of the Code) attributable to a plan amendment, unlessthe cost increase attributable to the amendment is less than 5% of theactuarial costs determined without regard to the amendment;(2) The extension of coverage under the plan to a new group of employeesresulting in an increase of 5% or more in the plan's liability for accruedbenefits; (3) A plan merger, consolidation or spinoff that is not <T3>de minimis</T3> pursuant to the regulations under section 414(1) ofthe Code; (4) The shutdown of any facility, plant, store, etc., that creates immediateeligibility for benefits that would not otherwise be immediately payablefor participants separating from service; (5) The offer by the plan for a temporary period to permit participantsto retire at benefit levels greater than that to which they would otherwisebe entitled; (6) A cost-of-living increase for retirees resulting in an increase of5% or more in the plan's liability for accrued benefits; (7) For premium payment years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, anyother event or trend that results in a material increase in the value ofunfunded vested benefits; and (8) For premium payment years beginning in 1988, an increase in the averageage of plan participants by more than two years. (e) <T3>Special calculation date for new and newly covered plans.</T3> Forpurposes of this section, the determination or calculation of a plan'sunfunded vested benefits with respect to a new plan or a newly coveredplan (as defined in andSection; 2610.2) shall be made as of the first dayof the premium payment year or, if later, the date on which the plan becameeffective for benefit accruals for future service, and all references inparagraphs (a) through (d) of this section to the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year shall be deemed to refer to suchday or date. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Variable rate exemptions and special rules. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Exemptions.</T3> A plan described in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3),or (a)(4) of this section is not required to determine its unfunded vestedbenefits under andSection; 2610.23 and does not owe a variable rate amountunder andSection; 2610.22(a)(2). (1) <T3>Certain fully funded plans.</T3> With respect to premium payment yearsbeginning on or after January 1, 1989, a plan is described in this paragraphif the plan had fewer than 500 participants on the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year, and an enrolled actuary certifiesin accordance with the Premium Payment Package that, as of that date, theplan had no unfunded vested benefits (valued at the interest rate prescribedin andSection; 2610.23(b)(1)). (2) <T3>Plans without vested benefit liabilities.</T3> A plan is describedin this paragraph if it did not have any participants with vested benefitsas of the last day of the plan year preceding the premium payment year,and the plan administrator so certifies in accordance with the PremiumPayment Package. (3) <T3>Section 412(i) plans.</T3> A plan is described in this paragraph ifthe plan was a plan described in section 412(i) of the Code and the regulationsthereunder at all times during the plan year preceding the premium paymentyear and the plan administrator so certifies, in accordance with the PremiumPayment Package. If the plan is a new plan or a newly covered plan (asdefined in andSection; 2610.2), the certification under this paragraph shallbe made as of the due date for the premium under andSection; 2610.25(d) andshall certify to the plan's status at all times during the premium paymentyear through such due date. (4) <T3>Plans terminating in standard terminations.</T3> The exemption fora plan described in this paragraph applies with respect to premium paymentyears beginning on or after January 1, 1989, and is conditioned upon theplan's making a final distribution of assets in a standard termination.If a plan is ultimately unable to do so, the exemption is revoked and allvariable rate amounts not paid pursuant to this exemption are due retroactiveto the applicable due date(s). A plan is described in this paragraph if_(i) The plan administrator has issued notices of intent to terminate theplan in a standard termination in accordance with section 4041(a)(2) ofthe Act; and (ii) The proposed termination date set forth in the notice of intent toterminate is on or before the last day of the plan year preceding the premiumpayment year. (b) <T3>Special rule for determining vested benefits for certain large plans.</T3>For premium payment years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, with respectto a plan that had 500 or more participants on the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year, if an enrolled actuary determinespursuant to andSection; 2610.23(a) that the actuarial value of plan assetsequals or exceeds the value of all benefits accrued under the plan (valuedat the interest rate prescribed in andSection; 2610.23(b)(1)), the enrolledactuary need not determine the value of the plan's vested benefits, andmay instead report in the Premium Payment Package the value of the accruedbenefits. (c) <T3>Special rule for determining unfunded vested benefits for plans terminatingin distress or involuntary terminations.</T3> With respect to premium paymentyears beginning on or after January 1, 1989, a plan described in this paragraphmay determine its unfunded vested benefits by using the special alternativecalculation method set forth in this paragraph. A plan is described inthis paragraph if it has issued notices of intent to terminate in a distresstermination in accordance with section 4041(a)(2) of the Act with a proposedtermination date on or before the last day of the plan year preceding thepremium payment year, or if the PBGC has instituted proceedings to terminatethe plan in accordance with section 4042 of the Act and has sought a terminationdate on or before the last day of the plan year preceding the premium paymentyear. Pursuant to this paragraph, a plan shall determine its unfunded vestedbenefits in accordance with the alternative calculation method in andSection;2610.23(c), except that_(2) the calculation shall be based on the Form 5500, Schedule B, for theplan year which includes (in the case of a distress termination) the proposedtermination date or (in the case of an involuntary termination) the terminationdate sought by the PBGC, or, if no Schedule B is filed for that plan year,on the Schedule B for the immediately preceding plan year; (2) All references in andSection; 2610.23(c) and andSection; 2610.23(d) tothe first day of the plan year preceding the premium payment year shallbe deemed to refer to the first day of the plan year for which the ScheduleB was filed; (3) The value of vested benefits entered in line 6d(ii) of the ScheduleB shall be adjusted (in lieu of the adjustment required by andSection; 2610.23(c)(1))by multiplying that value by the sum of 1 plus the product of .07 and thenumber of years (rounded to the nearest hundredth of a year) between thedate of the Schedule B data and (in the case of a distress termination)the proposed termination date or (in the case of an involuntary termination)the termination date sought by the PBGC; and (4) The exponent, ``Y,'' in the time adjustment formula of andSection; 2610.23(c)(5)shall be deemed to equal the number of years (rounded to the nearest hundredthof a year) between the date of the Schedule B data and the last day ofthe plan year preceding the premium payment year. (d) <T3>New and newly covered plans.</T3> In the case of a new plan or a newlycovered plan, all references in paragraphs (a), (b), (e) or (f) of thissection to the last day of the plan year preceding the premium paymentyear shall be deemed to refer to the first day of the premium payment yearor, if later, the date on which the plan became effective for benefit accrualsfor future service. (e) <T3>Small plan exemption for 1988 premium payment years.</T3> For premiumpayment years beginning in 1988, a plan described in this paragraph isnot required to determine its unfunded vested benefits under andSection;2610.23 and does not owe a variable rate amount under andSection; 2610.22(a)(2).A plan is described in this paragraph if_(1) The plan had fewer than 100 participants on the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year; (2) The plan is not eligible to use the alternative method for determiningunfunded vested benefits under andSection; 2610.23 because the plan doesnot have a Form 5500, Schedule B, meeting the requirements of that section;and (3) The plan's enrolled actuary certifies, in accordance with the PremiumPayment Package, that the plan had no unfunded vested benefits as of thelast day of the plan year preceding the premium payment year. (f) <T3>Small plan $5 rule for 1988 premium payment years. </T3>For premiumpayment years beginning in 1988, the plan administrator of a plan thatmeets the requirements of paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this sectionmay elect to pay, in lieu of the amount described in andSection; 2610.22(a)(2),an amount of $5 per participant, resulting in a total premium under andSection;2610.22 of $21 per participant. In this event, the variable rate amountowed for such plan for the premium payment year pursuant to andSection; 2610.22(a)shall be deemed to be $5 per participant, and the plan administrator isnot required to determine the plan's unfunded vested benefits under andSection;2610.23. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing requirement. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>The plan administrator of each plan shall file theform or forms prescribed by this part and any premium payments due, inaccordance with the instructions in the Premium Payment Package. The premiumforms and payments shall be filed no later than the applicable due datespecified in paragraph (b) or, for new plans or newly covered plans, paragraph(d) of this section. (b) <T3>Due dates. </T3>For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1988,the due date for small plans is prescribed in paragraph (b)(1) of thissection and the due dates for large plans are prescribed in paragraph (b)(2)of this section. (1) <T3>Plans with fewer than 500 participants. </T3>If the plan has fewerthan 500 participants, as determined under paragraph (c) of this section,the due date is the fifteenth day of the eighth full calendar month followingthe month in which the plan year began. (2) <T3>Plans with 500 or more participants. </T3>If the plan has 500 or moreparticipants, as determined under paragraph (c) of this section_(i) The due date for the flat rate portion of the premium required by andSection;2610.22(a)(1) is the last day of the second full calendar month followingthe close of the plan year preceding the premium payment year; and (ii) The due date for the variable rate portion of the premium requiredby andSection; 2610.22(a)(2) is the fifteenth day of the eighth full calendarmonth following the month in which the premium payment year begins. (iii) If the number of plan participants on the last day of the plan yearpreceding the premium payment year is not known by the date specified inparagraph (b)(2)(i) of this section, a reconciliation filing (on the formprescribed by this part) and any required premium payment or request forrefund shall be made by the date specified in paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of thissection. (3) <T3>Plans that change plan years. </T3>For any plan that changes its planyear, the premium form or forms and payment or payments for the short planyear shall be filed by the applicable due date or dates specified in paragraphs(b)(1), (b)(2), or (d) of this section. For the plan year that followsa short plan year, the due date or dates for the premium forms and paymentsshall be, with respect to each such due date, the later of_(i) The applicable due date or dates specified in paragraphs (b)(1) or(b)(2) of this section; or (ii) 30 days after the date on which the amendment changing the plan yearwas adopted.(c) <T3>Participant count rule for purposes of determining filing due dates.</T3>For purposes of determining under paragraph (b) of this section whethera plan has fewer than 500 participants, or 500 or more participants, theplan administrator shall use the number of participants for whom premiumswere payable for the plan year preceding the premium payment year. (d) <T3>Due dates for new and newly covered plans. </T3>Notwithstanding theprovisions of paragraph (b) of this section, the premium form and paymentfor both the flat rate portion and the variable rate portion of the premiumfor the first plan year of coverage of any new plan or newly covered plan(as defined in andSection; 2610.2) shall be filed on or before the latestof_ (1) The fifteenth day of the eighth full calendar month following the monthin which the plan year began or, if later, in which the plan became effectivefor benefit accruals for future service; (2) 90 days after the date of the plan's adoption; or (3) 90 days after the date on which the plan became covered by Title IVof the Act pursuant to section 4021 of the Act. (e) <T3>Continuing obligation to file. </T3>The obligation to file the formor forms prescribed by this part and to pay any premiums due continuesthrough the plan year in which all plan assets are distributed pursuantto a plan's termination or in which a trustee is appointed under section4042 of the Act, whichever occurs earlier. The entire premium computedunder this subpart is due, irrespective of whether the plan is entitledto a refund for a short plan year pursuant to andSection; 2610.22(d). (f) <T3>Improper filings. </T3>Any form not filed in accordance with this part,not filed in accordance with the instructions in the Premium Payment Package,not accompanied by the required premium payment, or otherwise incomplete,may, in the discretion of the PBGC, be returned with any payment accompanyingthe form to the plan administrator, and such payment shall be treated asnot having been made. If on the form or forms filed with the PBGC, anyof the items necessary to establish the correct variable rate premium owedby the plan are omitted, the variab1e rate portion of the premium owedby the plan with respect to that premium payment may be deemed to be themaximum $34 per participant charge, pursuant to andSection; 2610.22(a)(3).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.26 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Liability for premiums. </ITAG>(a) The designation under this subpart of the plan administrator as theperson required to file the applicable forms and to submit the premiumpayment is a procedural requirement only and does not alter the liabilityfor premium payments imposed by section 4007 of the Act. Pursuant to section4007(e) of the Act, both the plan administrator and the plan's contributingsponsor are liable for premium payments, and, if the contributing sponsoris a member of a controlled group, each member of the controlled groupis jointly and severally liable for the required premiums. Any entity thatis liable for required premiums is also liable for any interest and penaltiesassessed with respect to such premiums. (b) For any plan year in which a plan administrator issues (pursuant tosection 4041(a)(2) of the Act) notices of intent to terminate in a distresstermination under section 4041(c) of the Act or the PBGC initiates a terminationproceeding under section 4042 of the Act, and for each plan year thereafter,the obligation to pay the premiums (and any interest or penalties thereon)imposed by the Act and this Part shall be an obligation solely of the contributingsponsor and the members of its controlled group, if any. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Single-Employer Premiums for Pre-1988 Plan Years; MultiemployerPremiums </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope. </ITAG>This subpart provides rules for calculating and procedures for paying premiumsfor single-employer plans with respect to plan years beginning before l988,and for multiemployer plans with respect to all plan years. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.32 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single-employer premium rates. </ITAG>(a) For plans other than multiemployer plans, the premium rate for basicbenefits guaranteed under section 4022(a) of the Act is as follows:(1) For plan years beginning before September 2, 1976: one dollar for eachindividual who is a participant in the plan at any time during the planyear; (2) For plan years beginning on or after September 2, 1976, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1977: one dollar for each individualwho is a participant in the plan on the last day of the preceding planyear: (3) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1978, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1985: two dollars sixty cents foreach individual who is a participant in the plan on the last day of thepreceding plan year; (4) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1986, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1987: eight dollars fifty cents foreach individual who is a participant in the plan on the last day of thepreceding plan year. (b) <T3>Newly covered plans. </T3>For any plan not previously covered by section4021 of the Act, the plan administrator shall pay the applicable premiumunder paragraph (a) of this section for each individual who is a participantin the plan on the date the plan becomes covered by section 4021(a) ofthe Act. (c) <T3>Changes in plan years. </T3>For the first full plan year beginningafter a plan changes its plan year, the plan administrator shall pay theapplicable premium under paragraph (a) of this section for each individualwho is a participant in the plan on the last day of the short plan year.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.33 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Multiemployer premium rates. </ITAG>(a) For multiemployer plans, the premium rate for basic benefits guaranteedunder section 4022A(a) is as follows: (1) For plan years beginning after September 26, 1980, multiemployer plansshall pay premiums at the rate set forth in the following table for eachindividual who is a participant in such plan on the last day of the planyear preceding the premium payment year. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,6 </C>  <H1>For premium payment years </H1><H1>Rate</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">After Sept. 26, 1980, and before Sept. 27, 1984 <D>$1.40 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">After Sept. 26, 1984, and before Sept. 27, 1986 <D>1.80 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">After Sept. 26, 1986, and before Sept. 27, 1988 <D>2.20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">After Sept. 26, 1988 <D>2.60</D></ITAG></ITAG>  (2) For the plan year in which September 26, 1980, falls (the ``enactmentyear''), multiemployer plans shall pay a premium for each individual whois a participant in the plan on the last day of the preceding plan yearat the rate set forth in the following table: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,6 </C>  <H1>For premium payment years beginning in </H1><H1>Rate</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">September 1979 <D>$.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">October 1979 <D>.54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">November 1979 <D>.58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">December 1979 <D>.62 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1980 <D>.67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1980 <D>.71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">March 1980 <D>.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">April 1980 <D>.79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">May 1980 <D>.83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">June 1980 <D>.88 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">JuIy 1980 <D>.92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">August 1980 <D>.96 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">September 1980 (on or before Sept. 26) <D>1.00</D></ITAG></ITAG>  (b) <T3>New and newly covered plans. </T3>For any new plan or newly coveredplan (as defined in andSection; 2610.2), the plan administrator shall paythe applicable premium under paragraph (a) of this section for each individualwho is a participant in the plan on_ (1) The date the plan becomes covered by section 4021(a) of the Act, ifthe premium payment year begins before January 1, 1988; or (2) The first day of the premium payment year or, if later, the date onwhich the plan became effective for benefit accruals for future service,if the premium payment year begins on or after January 1, 1988. (c) <T3>Changes in plan years. </T3>For the first full plan year beginningafter a plan changes its plan year, the plan administrator shall pay theapplicable premium under paragraph (a) of this section for each individualwho is a participant in the plan on the last day of the short plan year.(d) <T3>Special refund rule for certain short plan years. </T3>A plan describedin this paragraph is entitled to a refund for a short plan year that beginson or after January 1, 1989. The plan must pay the full premium due andrequest a refund from the PBGC. The amount of the refund will be determinedby prorating the premium for the short plan year by the number of months(treating a part of a month as a month) in the short plan year. A planis described in this paragraph if_ (1) The plan is a new or newly covered plan that becomes effective forpremium purposes on a date other than the first day of its first plan year;(2) The plan adopts an amendment changing its plan year, resulting in ashort plan year; or (3) The plan's assets are distributed pursuant to the plan's termination,in which case the short plan year for purposes of computing the amountof the refund under this paragraph shall be deemed to end on the assetdistribution date. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2610.34 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing requirement. </ITAG>(a) The plan administrator of each covered plan shall file the form prescribedby this part and any premium payments due, in accordance with the premiumdeclaration instructions accompanying the form. Due dates for new or newlycovered plans and plans with short plan years are in paragraphs (a)(8)and (a)(9) of this section. For other plans, the premium form and paymentsshall be filed no later than the date specified in the applicable paragraph(a)(1) through (a)(7)(ii) as follows: (1) For plan years beginning before and in progress on September 2, 1974:October 2, 1974; (2) For plan years beginning on or after September 2, 1974, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1977: 30 days after the beginningof the plan year; (3) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1978, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1980: seven months after the closeof the prior plan year; (4) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1981, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1984: the last day of the seventhmonth following the close of the prior plan year; (5) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1985, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1985: (i) If the plan has fewer than 10,000 participants for the plan year, asdetermined under paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of theseventh month following the close of the prior plan year; or (ii) If the plan has 10,000 or more participants for the plan year, asdetermined under paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of thesecond full month following March 29, 1985 or, if later, the last day ofthe second month following the close of the prior plan year; and (6) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1986, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1987: (i) If the plan has fewer than 500 participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of the seventh monthfollowing the close of the prior plan year; or (ii) If the plan has 500 or more participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of the second monthfollowing the close of the prior plan year. (7) For plan years of multiemployer plans beginning on or after January1, 1988_ (i) If the plan has fewer than 500 participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the fifteenth day of the eighthfull calendar month following the month in which the premium payment yearbegins; or (ii) If the plan has 500 or more participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of the second monthfollowing the close of the prior plan year. (8) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(7)of this section, for any new plan or plan newly covered by section 4021of the Act, the first premium form and payments due for the first yearof coverage shall be filed on or before the latest of_ (i) In the case of plan years beginning before January 1, 1988: (A) The last day of the seventh month following the beginning of the planyear; (B) 90 days after the date of the plan's adoption; (C) 90 days after the date on which the plan became effective for benefitaccruals for future service; or (D) 90 days after the date on which the plan became covered by section4021 of the Act; and (ii) In the case of plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1988: (A) The fifteenth day of the eighth full calendar month following the monthin which the plan year began or, if later, in which the plan became effectivefor benefit accruals for future service; (B) 90 days after the date of the plan's adoption; or (C) 90 days after the date on which the plan became covered by Title IVof the Act pursuant to section 4021 of the Act. (9) For any plan that changes its plan year, the premium form and paymentsfor the short plan year are due in accordance with the provisions of paragraphs(a)(1) through (a)(7) of this section. Premium forms and payments for theplan year that follows a short plan year shall be filed on or before thelater of 30 days after the date on which the amendment to change the planyear was adopted, or the date specified in the applicable paragraph asfollows: (i) For plan years beginning before January 1, 1985, the last day of theseventh month following the close of the preceding short plan year; and(ii) For plan years beginning on or after January 1, 1985, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1985_(A) If the plan has fewer than 10,000 participants for the plan year, asdetermined under paragraph (a)(10) of this section: the last day of theseventh month following the close of the preceding short plan year; or(B) If the plan has 10,000 or more participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section: the last day of the second monthfollowing the close of the preceding short plan year; and(iii) For plan years beginning on or after January l, 1986, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1987_(A) If the plan has fewer than 500 participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section: the last day of the seventh monthfollowing the close of the preceding short plan year; or(B) If the plan has 500 or more participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section: the last day of the second monthfollowing the close of the preceding short plan year.(iv) For plan years of multiemployer plans beginning on or after Januaryl, 1988_(A) If the plan has fewer than 500 participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the fifteenth day of the eighthfull calendar month following the month in which the premium payment yearbegins; or(B) If the plan has 500 or more participants for the plan year, as determinedunder paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the last day of the second monthfollowing the close of the prior plan year.(10) For purposes of paragraphs (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), (a)(9), (b)(4),(b)(5), and (b)(6) of this section, the number of participants in a planyear is determined as of the following dates:(i) If the plan year is the plan's second plan year, the first day of thefirst plan year; or(ii) If the plan year is the plan's third or a subsequent plan year, thelast day of the second preceding plan year.(b) <T3>Reconciliation due date. </T3>The plan administrator of each coveredplan shall file the premium reconciliation form prescribed by this part,in accordance with the instructions accompanying the form, no later thanthe date specified in the applicable paragraph as follows:(1) For plan years beginning before September 2, 1976: two years and 30days after the beginning of the plan year;(2) For plan years beginning on or after September 2, 1976, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1976: one year and 30 days after thebeginning of the plan year;(3) For plan years beginning on or after January l, 1977, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1977: seven months after the closeof the plan year; or(4) For plan years beginning on or after January l, 1985, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1985, if the plan has 10,000 or moreparticipants for the plan year, as determined under paragraph (a)(10) ofthis section: the last day of the seventh month following the close ofthe prior plan year.(5) For plan years beginning on or after January l, 1986, up to and includingplan years beginning on December 31, 1987, if the plan has 500 or moreparticipants for the plan year, as determined under paragraph (a)(10) ofthis section: the last day of the seventh month following the close ofthe prior plan year.(6) For plan years of multiemployer plans beginning on or after January1, 1988, if the plan has 500 or more participants for the plan year, asdetermined under paragraph (a)(10) of this section, the fifteenth day ofthe eighth full calendar month following the month in which the premiumpayment year begins.(c) <T3>Continuing obligation to file.</T3> The obligation to file the formprescribed by this subpart and to pay any premiums due continues untilplan assets are distributed under a termination procedure or until a trusteeis appointed under section 4042 of the Act, whichever occurs earlier. Theentire premium computed under this subpart is due, irrespective of whetherthe plan is entitled to a refund for a post-1988 short plan year (in thecase of certain multiemployer plans) pursuant to andSection; 2610.33(d).(d) <T3>Improper filings. </T3>Any form not filed in accordance with this subpart,not filed in accordance with the instructions contained in the form, notaccompanied by the required premium payment, or otherwise incomplete, may,in the discretion of the PBGC, be returned in whole or in part to the planadministrator and treated as not having been filed.(e) <T3>Transitional rule for multiemployer plans. </T3>For the plan year inwhich September 26, 1980, falls (``the enactment year''), the premium determinedunder andSection; 2610.33 is due on the date determined under paragraphs(a)(3) or (a)(4) of this section, unless the enactment year begins beforeJuly l, 1980. If the enactment year begins before July 1, 1980, the premiumis due in two installments as follows:(1) The multiemployer plan shall pay, on the date determined under paragraph(a)(3) or (a)(4) of this section, a premium of fifty cents for each individualwho is a participant in the plan on the last day of the preceding planyear; and(2) The plan shall pay, within 30 days after PBGC issues a notice of theadditional premium due under andSection; 2610.33, such additiona1 premium.However, if the plan fails to pay the amount described in paragraph (e)(1)before January 31, 1981, the additional premium shall be due on the earlierof 30 days after the PBGC issues a notice of the additional premium orMarch 31, 1981.<ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Part 2610_Late Payment Interest Charges</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following table lists the late payment interest rates under andSection;2610.7(a) for the specified time periods:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,r25,7</C> <H1>From_</H1><H1>Through_</H1><H1>Interest rate (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">September 2, 1974<D>June 30, 1975</D><D>6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">July l, 1975<D>January 31, 1976</D><D>9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1, 1976<D>January 31, 1978</D><D>7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1, 1978<D>January 31, 1980</D><D>6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1, 1980<D>January 31, 1982</D><D>12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1, 1982<D>December 31, 1982</D><D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1, 1983<D>June 30, 1983</D><D>16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">July 1, 1983<D>December 31, 1984</D><D>11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1, 1985<D>June 30, 1985</D><D>13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">July 1, 1985<D>December 31, 1985</D><D>11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1, 1986<D>June 30, 1986</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">July 1, 1986<D>September 30, 1987</D><D>9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">October 1, 1987<D>December 31, 1987</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1, 1988<D>March 31, 1988</D><D>11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">April 1, 1988<D>September 30, 1988</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">October 1, 1988<D>March 31, 1989</D><D>11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">April 1, 1989<D/><D>12</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix B to Part 2610_Interest Rates For Valuing Vested Benefits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following table lists the required interest rates to be used invaluing a plan's vested benefits under andSection; 2610.23(b) and in calculatinga plan's adjusted, vested benefits under andSection; 2610.23(c)(1):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8</C>   <H1>For premium payment years beginning in_</H1><H1>Required interest rate \1\</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">January 1988<D>7.30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1988<D>7.06 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">March 1988<D>6.74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">April 1988<D>6.90 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">May 1988<D>7.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">June 1988<D>7.38 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">July 1988<D>7.20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">August 1988<D>7.31 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">September 1988<D>7.46 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">October 1988<D>7.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">November 1988<D>7.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">December 1988<D>7.22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">January 1989<D>7.21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">February 1989<D>7.14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">March 1989<D>7.21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">April 1989<D>7.34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">May 1989<D>7.22  </D><F>\1\ The required interest rate listed above is equal to 80% of the annualyield for 30-year Treasury constant maturities, as reported in FederalReserve Statistical Release G.13 and H.15, for the calendar month precedingthe calendar month in which the premium payment year begins.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC this 29th day of June 1989.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Elizabeth Dole, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Chairman, Board of Directors, Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued on the date set forth pursuant to a resolution of the Boardof Directors authorizing its chairman to issue this final rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Carol Connor Flowe, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary, Board of Directors Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-15866 Filed 7-7-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7708-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>